Florida, session 2026, SB320.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 158 159 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 160 120.81, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 161 120.81âExceptions and special requirements; general areas.â 162 (1)âEDUCATIONAL UNITS.â 163 (a)âDistrict school boards are not subject to the 164 requirements for rules in this chapter when making and adopting 165 rules with public input at a public meeting. Notwithstanding s. 166 120.536(1) and the flush left provisions of s. 120.52(8), 167 district school boards may adopt rules to implement their 168 general powers under s. 1001.41. 169 Section 2.âSubsections (5) and (6) are added to section 170 1001.23, Florida Statutes, to read: 171 1001.23âSpecific powers and duties of the Department of 172 Education.âIn addition to all other duties assigned to it by law 173 or by rule of the State Board of Education, the department 174 shall: 175 (5)âAnnually by August 1, inform district school 176 superintendents that pursuant to s. 120.565, the superintendents 177 may receive a declaratory statement, within 90 days after 178 submitting a petition to receive such statement, regarding the 179 departmentâs opinion as to the applicability of a statutory or 180 rule provision to a school district as it applies to the 181 districtâs particular set of circumstances. 182 (6)âAnnually maintain and make available to school 183 districts a list of all requirements in statute and rule 184 relating to required actions by district school boards or 185 superintendents. The list must include, but is not limited to, 186 required parent notifications; information that must be posted 187 on the district website; and reporting, filing, and 188 certification requirements. 189 Section 3.âParagraph (l) of subsection (12) of section 190 1001.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 191 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 192 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 193 powers and perform all duties listed below: 194 (12)âFINANCE.âTake steps to assure students adequate 195 educational facilities through the financial procedure 196 authorized in chapters 1010 and 1011 and as prescribed below: 197 (l)âInternal auditor.âMay or, in the case of a school 198 district receiving annual federal, state, and local funds in 199 excess of $500 million, shall employ an internal auditor. The 200 scope of the internal auditor shall not be restricted and shall 201 include every functional and program area of the school system. 202 1.âThe internal auditor shall perform ongoing financial 203 verification of the financial records of the school district, a 204 comprehensive risk assessment of all areas of the school system 205 every 5 years, and other audits and reviews as the district 206 school board directs for determining: 207 a.âThe adequacy of internal controls designed to prevent 208 and detect fraud, waste, and abuse as defined in s. 11.45(1). 209 b.âCompliance with applicable laws, rules, contracts, grant 210 agreements, district school board-approved policies, and best 211 practices. 212 c.âThe efficiency of operations. 213 d.âThe reliability of financial records and reports. 214 e.âThe safeguarding of assets. 215 f.âFinancial solvency. 216 g.âProjected revenues and expenditures. 217 h.âThe rate of change in the general fund balance. 218 2.âThe internal auditor shall prepare audit reports of his 219 or her findings and report directly to the district school board 220 or its designee. 221 3.âAny person responsible for furnishing or producing any 222 book, record, paper, document, data, or sufficient information 223 necessary to conduct a proper audit or examination which the 224 internal auditor is by law authorized to perform is subject to 225 the provisions of s. 11.47(3) and (4). 226 Section 4.âSubsection (16) of section 1002.20, Florida 227 Statutes, is amended to read: 228 1002.20âK-12 student and parent rights.âParents of public 229 school students must receive accurate and timely information 230 regarding their childâs academic progress and must be informed 231 of ways they can help their child to succeed in school. K-12 232 students and their parents are afforded numerous statutory 233 rights including, but not limited to, the following: 234 (16)âSCHOOL ACCOUNTABILITY AND SCHOOL IMPROVEMENT RATING 235 REPORTS; FISCAL TRANSPARENCY.âParents of public school students 236 have the right to an easy-to-read report card about the schoolâs 237 grade designation or, if applicable under s. 1008.341, the 238 schoolâs improvement rating, and the schoolâs accountability 239 report, including the school financial report as required under 240 s. 1010.215. The school financial report must be provided to the 241 parents and indicate the average amount of money expended per 242 student in the school, which must also be included in the 243 student handbook or a similar publication. The department shall 244 produce the reports required under this subsection and make the 245 reports for each school available on the departmentâs website in 246 a prominent location. Each public school district shall provide 247 a link on its website to such reports for parent access. 248 Section 5.âParagraph (g) of subsection (18) of section 249 1002.33, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 250 1002.33âCharter schools.â 251 (18)âFACILITIES.â 252 (g)âEach school district shall annually provide to the 253 Department of Education as part of its 5-year work plan the 254 number of existing vacant classrooms in each school that the 255 district does not intend to use or does not project will be 256 needed for educational purposes for the following school year. 257 The department may recommend that a district make such space 258 available to an appropriate charter school. 259 Section 6.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 260 1002.451, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 261 1002.451âDistrict innovation school of technology program.â 262 (5)âEXEMPTION FROM STATUTES.â 263 (a)âAn innovation school of technology is exempt from 264 chapters 1000-1013. However, an innovation school of technology 265 shall comply with the following provisions of those chapters: 266 1.âLaws pertaining to the following: 267 a.âSchools of technology, including this section. 268 b.âStudent assessment program and school grading system. 269 c.âServices to students who have disabilities. 270 d.âCivil rights, including s. 1000.05, relating to 271 discrimination. 272 e.âStudent health, safety, and welfare. 273 2.âLaws governing the election and compensation of district 274 school board members and election or appointment and 275 compensation of district school superintendents. 276 3.âSection 1003.03, governing maximum class size, except 277 that the calculation for compliance pursuant to s. 1003.03 is 278 the average at the school level. 279 4.âSections 1012.22(1)(c) and 1012.27(2), relating to 280 compensation and salary schedules. 281 5.âSection 1012.33(5), relating to workforce reductions, 282 for annual contracts for instructional personnel. This 283 subparagraph does not apply to at-will employees. 284 6.âSection 1012.335, relating to contracts with 285 instructional personnel hired on or after July 1, 2011, for 286 annual or instructional multiyear contracts for instructional 287 personnel. This subparagraph does not apply to at-will 288 employees. 289 7.âSection 1012.34, relating to requirements for 290 performance evaluations of instructional personnel and school 291 administrators. 292 Section 7.âParagraph (a) of subsection (10) of section 293 1002.61, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 294 1002.61âSummer prekindergarten program delivered by public 295 schools and private prekindergarten providers.â 296 (10)(a)âEach early learning coalition shall verify that 297 each private prekindergarten provider and public school 298 delivering the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 299 within the coalitionâs county or multicounty region complies 300 with this part. 301 Section 8.âSubsection (9) of section 1002.63, Florida 302 Statutes, is amended to read: 303 1002.63âSchool-year prekindergarten program delivered by 304 public schools.â 305 (9)(a)âEach early learning coalition shall verify that each 306 public school delivering the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 307 Program within the coalitionâs service area complies with this 308 part. 309 (b)âIf a public school fails or refuses to comply with this 310 part or engages in misconduct, the department must shall require 311 that the school district to remove the school from eligibility 312 to deliver the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program and 313 receive state funds under this part for a period of at least 2 314 years but no more than 5 years. 315 Section 9.âParagraph (b) of subsection (6) and subsection 316 (7) of section 1002.71, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 317 1002.71âFunding; financial and attendance reporting.â 318 (6) 319 (b)1.âEach private prekindergarten providerâs and district 320 school boardâs attendance policy must require the parent of each 321 student in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program to 322 verify, each month, the studentâs attendance on the prior 323 monthâs certified student attendance. 324 2.âThe parent must submit the verification of the studentâs 325 attendance to the private prekindergarten provider or public 326 school on forms prescribed by the department. The forms must 327 include, in addition to the verification of the studentâs 328 attendance, a certification, in substantially the following 329 form, that the parent continues to choose the private 330 prekindergarten provider or public school in accordance with s. 331 1002.53 and directs that payments for the program be made to the 332 provider or school: 333 334 VERIFICATION OF STUDENTâS ATTENDANCE 335 AND CERTIFICATION OF PARENTAL CHOICE 336 337 I, ...(Name of Parent)..., swear (or affirm) that my child, 338 ...(Name of Student)..., attended the Voluntary Prekindergarten 339 Education Program on the days listed above and certify that I 340 continue to choose ...(Name of Provider or School)... to deliver 341 the program for my child and direct that program funds be paid 342 to the provider or school for my child. 343 ...(Signature of Parent)... 344 ...(Date)... 345 346 3.âThe private prekindergarten provider or public school 347 must keep each original signed form for at least 2 years. Each 348 private prekindergarten provider must permit the early learning 349 coalition, and each public school must permit the school 350 district, to inspect the original signed forms during normal 351 business hours. The department shall adopt procedures for early 352 learning coalitions and school districts to review the original 353 signed forms against the certified student attendance. The 354 review procedures must shall provide for the use of selective 355 inspection techniques, including, but not limited to, random 356 sampling. Each early learning coalition and the school districts 357 must comply with the review procedures. 358 (7)âThe department shall require that administrative 359 expenditures be kept to the minimum necessary for efficient and 360 effective administration of the Voluntary Prekindergarten 361 Education Program. Administrative policies and procedures must 362 shall be revised, to the maximum extent practicable, be revised 363 to incorporate the use of automation and electronic submission 364 of forms, including those required for child eligibility and 365 enrollment, provider and class registration, and monthly 366 certification of attendance for payment. A school district may 367 use its automated daily attendance reporting system for the 368 purpose of maintaining and transmitting attendance records to 369 the early learning coalition in a mutually agreed-upon format. 370 Each school district shall certify the correctness of attendance 371 data submitted to the single point of entry system described in 372 paragraph (5)(a) as required by the department. In addition, 373 actions must shall be taken to reduce paperwork, eliminate the 374 duplication of reports, and eliminate other duplicative 375 activities. Each early learning coalition may retain and expend 376 no more than 5.0 percent of the funds paid by the coalition to 377 private prekindergarten providers and public schools under 378 paragraph (5)(b). Funds retained by an early learning coalition 379 under this subsection may be used only for administering the 380 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program and may not be used 381 for the school readiness program or other programs. 382 Section 10.âSubsection (2) of section 1006.40, Florida 383 Statutes, is amended to read: 384 1006.40âPurchase of instructional materials.â 385 (2)âEach district school board must purchase current 386 instructional materials to provide each student in kindergarten 387 through grade 12 with a major tool of instruction in core 388 courses of the subject areas of mathematics, language arts, 389 science, social studies, reading, and literature. Such purchase 390 must be made within the first 5 3 years after the effective date 391 of the adoption cycle, subject to state board requirement for an 392 earlier purchase date for a specific subject area, unless a 393 district school board or a consortium of school districts has 394 implemented an instructional materials program pursuant to s. 395 1006.283. 396 Section 11.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 1008.212, 397 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 398 1008.212âStudents with disabilities; extraordinary 399 exemption.â 400 (2)âA student with a disability for whom the individual 401 education plan (IEP) team determines is prevented by a 402 circumstance or condition from physically demonstrating the 403 mastery of skills that have been acquired and are measured by 404 the statewide standardized assessment, a statewide standardized 405 end-of-course assessment, or an alternate assessment pursuant to 406 s. 1008.22(3)(d) shall be granted an extraordinary exemption 407 from the administration of the assessment. A learning, 408 emotional, behavioral, or significant cognitive disability, or 409 the receipt of services through the homebound or hospitalized 410 program in accordance with rule 6A-6.03020, Florida 411 Administrative Code, is not, in and of itself, an adequate 412 criterion for the granting of an extraordinary exemption. The 413 first two administrations of the coordinated screening and 414 progress monitoring system under s. 1008.25(9) or any alternate 415 assessments used in lieu of such administrations are not subject 416 to the requirements of this section. 417 (3)âThe IEP team, which must include the parent, may submit 418 to the district school superintendent a written request for an 419 extraordinary exemption from the end-of-year or end-of-course 420 statewide, standardized assessment at any time during the school 421 year, but not later than 60 days before the current yearâs 422 assessment administration for which the request is made. A 423 request must include all of the following: 424 (a)âA written description of the studentâs disabilities, 425 including a specific description of the studentâs impaired 426 sensory, manual, or speaking skills. 427 (b)âWritten documentation of the most recent evaluation 428 data. 429 (c)âWritten documentation, if available, of the most recent 430 administration of the statewide standardized assessment, an end 431 of-course assessment, or an alternate assessment. 432 (d)âA written description of the conditionâs effect on the 433 studentâs participation in the statewide standardized 434 assessment, an end-of-course assessment, or an alternate 435 assessment. 436 (e)âWritten evidence that the student has had the 437 opportunity to learn the skills being tested. 438 (f)âWritten evidence that the student has been provided 439 appropriate instructional accommodations. 440 (g)âWritten evidence as to whether the student has had the 441 opportunity to be assessed using the instructional 442 accommodations on the studentâs IEP which are allowable in the 443 administration of the statewide standardized assessment, an end 444 of-course assessment, or an alternate assessment in prior 445 assessments. 446 (h)âWritten evidence of the circumstance or condition as 447 defined in subsection (1). 448 Section 12.âParagraphs (a), (b), and (d) of subsection (7) 449 of section 1008.22, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 450 1008.22âStudent assessment program for public schools.â 451 (7)âASSESSMENT SCHEDULES AND REPORTING OF RESULTS.â 452 (a)âThe Commissioner of Education shall establish schedules 453 for the administration of statewide, standardized assessments 454 and the reporting of student assessment results. The 455 commissioner shall consider the observance of religious and 456 school holidays when developing the schedules. By January 1 of 457 each year, the commissioner shall notify each school district in 458 writing and publish on the departmentâs website the assessment 459 schedule for, at a minimum, the next 2 school years. The 460 assessment and reporting schedules must provide the earliest 461 possible reporting of student assessment results to the school 462 districts. Assessment results for the statewide, standardized 463 ELA and Mathematics assessments and all statewide, standardized 464 EOC assessments must be made available no later than June 30, 465 except for results for the grade 3 statewide, standardized ELA 466 assessment, which must be made available no later than May 31. 467 Beginning with the 2023-2024 school year, assessment results for 468 the statewide, standardized ELA and Mathematics assessments must 469 be available no later than May 31. School districts shall 470 administer statewide, standardized assessments in accordance 471 with the schedule established by the commissioner. 472 (b)âBy January of each year, the commissioner shall publish 473 on the departmentâs website a uniform calendar that includes the 474 assessment and reporting schedules for, at a minimum, the next 2 475 school years. The uniform calendar must be provided to school 476 districts in an electronic format that allows each school 477 district and public school to populate the calendar with, at 478 minimum, the following information for reporting the district 479 assessment schedules under paragraph (d): 480 1.âWhether the assessment is a district-required assessment 481 or a state-required assessment. 482 2.âThe specific date or dates that each assessment will be 483 administered, including administrations of the coordinated 484 screening and progress monitoring system under s. 1008.25(9)(b). 485 3.âThe time allotted to administer each assessment. 486 4.âWhether the assessment is a computer-based assessment or 487 a paper-based assessment. 488 5.âThe grade level or subject area associated with the 489 assessment. 490 6.âThe date that the assessment results are expected to be 491 available to teachers and parents. 492 7.âThe type of assessment, the purpose of the assessment, 493 and the use of the assessment results. 494 8.âA glossary of assessment terminology. 495 9.âEstimates of average time for administering state 496 required and district-required assessments, by grade level. 497 (c)(d)âEach school district shall, by November 1 of each 498 year, establish schedules for the administration of any 499 statewide, standardized assessments and district-required 500 assessments and approve the schedules as an agenda item at a 501 district school board meeting. Each school district shall 502 publish the testing schedules on its website which specify 503 whether an assessment is a state-required or district-required 504 assessment and the grade bands or subject areas associated with 505 the assessments using the uniform calendar, including all 506 information required under paragraph (b), and submit the 507 schedules to the Department of Education by October 1 of each 508 year. Each public school shall publish schedules for statewide, 509 standardized assessments and district-required assessments on 510 its website using the uniform calendar, including all 511 information required under paragraph (b). The school board 512 approved assessment uniform calendar must be included in the 513 parent guide required by s. 1002.23(5). 514 Section 13.âParagraphs (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (9) 515 of section 1008.25, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 516 1008.25âPublic school student progression; student support; 517 coordinated screening and progress monitoring; reporting 518 requirements.â 519 (9)âCOORDINATED SCREENING AND PROGRESS MONITORING SYSTEM.â 520 (b)âBeginning with the 2022-2023 school year, private 521 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program providers and public 522 schools must participate in the coordinated screening and 523 progress monitoring system pursuant to this paragraph. 524 1.âFor students in the school-year Voluntary 525 Prekindergarten Education Program through grade 2, the 526 coordinated screening and progress monitoring system must be 527 administered at least three times within a school year, with the 528 first administration occurring no later than the first 30 529 instructional days after a studentâs enrollment or the start of 530 the school year, the second administration occurring midyear, 531 and the third administration occurring within the last 30 days 532 of the school year pursuant to state board rule. The state board 533 may adopt alternate timeframes to address nontraditional school 534 year calendars to ensure the coordinated screening and progress 535 monitoring program is administered a minimum of three times 536 within a year. 537 2.âFor students in the summer prekindergarten program, the 538 coordinated screening and progress monitoring system must be 539 administered two times, with the first administration occurring 540 no later than the first 10 instructional days after a studentâs 541 enrollment or the start of the summer prekindergarten program, 542 and the final administration occurring within the last 10 days 543 of the summer prekindergarten program pursuant to state board 544 rule. 545 3.âFor grades 3 through 10 English Language Arts and grades 546 3 through 8 Mathematics, the coordinated screening and progress 547 monitoring system must be administered at the beginning, middle, 548 and end of the school year pursuant to state board rule. The 549 end-of-year administration of the coordinated screening and 550 progress monitoring system must be a comprehensive progress 551 monitoring assessment administered in accordance with the 552 scheduling requirements under s. 1008.22(7)(b) s. 1008.22(7)(c). 553 (c)âTo facilitate timely interventions and supports 554 pursuant to subsection (4), the system must provide results from 555 the first two administrations of the progress monitoring to a 556 studentâs teacher or prekindergarten instructor within 1 week 557 and to the studentâs parent within 2 weeks after the 558 administration of the progress monitoring. Delivery of results 559 from the comprehensive, end-of-year progress monitoring ELA 560 assessment for grades 3 through 10 and Mathematics assessment 561 for grades 3 through 8 must be in accordance with s. 562 1008.22(7)(g) s. 1008.22(7)(h). 563 1.âA studentâs results from the coordinated screening and 564 progress monitoring system must be recorded in a written, easy 565 to-comprehend individual student report. Each school district 566 shall provide a parent secure access to his or her childâs 567 individual student reports through a web-based portal as part of 568 its student information system. Each early learning coalition 569 shall provide parents the individual student report in a format 570 determined by state board rule. 571 2.âIn addition to the information under subparagraph (a)5., 572 the report must also include parent resources that explain the 573 purpose of progress monitoring, assist the parent in 574 interpreting progress monitoring results, and support informed 575 parent involvement. Parent resources may include personalized 576 video formats. 577 3.âThe department shall annually update school districts 578 and early learning coalitions on new system features and 579 functionality and collaboratively identify with school districts 580 and early learning coalitions strategies for meaningfully 581 reporting to parents results from the coordinated screening and 582 progress monitoring system. The department shall develop ways to 583 increase the utilization, by instructional staff and parents, of 584 student assessment data and resources. 585 4.âAn individual student report must be provided in a 586 printed format upon a parentâs request. 587 (d)âScreening and progress monitoring system results, 588 including the number of students who demonstrate characteristics 589 of dyslexia and dyscalculia, shall be reported to the department 590 pursuant to state board rule and maintained in the departmentâs 591 Education Data Warehouse. Results must be provided to a 592 studentâs teacher and parent in a timely manner as required in 593 s. 1008.22(7)(f) s. 1008.22(7)(g). 594 Section 14.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) and subsection 595 (5) of section 1008.33, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 596 1008.33âAuthority to enforce public school improvement.â 597 (3) 598 (c)âThe state board shall adopt by rule a differentiated 599 matrix of intervention and support strategies for assisting 600 traditional public schools identified under this section and 601 rules for implementing s. 1002.33(9)(n), relating to charter 602 schools. The intervention and support strategies must address 603 student performance and may include improvement planning; 604 leadership quality improvement; educator quality improvement; 605 professional learning; curriculum review, pacing, and alignment 606 across grade levels to improve background knowledge in social 607 studies, science, and the arts; and the use of continuous 608 improvement and monitoring plans and processes. In addition, the 609 state board may prescribe reporting requirements to review and 610 monitor the progress of the schools. The rule must define the 611 intervention and support strategies for school improvement for 612 schools earning a grade of âDâ or âFâ and the roles for the 613 district and department. A school may not be required to use the 614 measure of student learning growth in s. 1012.34(7) as the sole 615 determinant to recruit instructional personnel. The rule must 616 create a timeline for a school districtâs school improvement 617 plan or district-managed turnaround plan to be approved and for 618 the school improvement funds under Title I to be released to the 619 school district. The timeline established in rule for the 620 release of school improvement funding under Title I may not 621 exceed 20 calendar days after the approval of the school 622 improvement plan or district-managed turnaround plan. 623 (5)âThe state board shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 624 120.536(1) and 120.54 to administer this section. The rules 625 shall include timelines for submission of implementation plans, 626 approval criteria for implementation plans, timelines for 627 releasing Title I funding, timelines for implementing 628 intervention and support strategies, a standard charter school 629 turnaround contract, a standard facility lease, and a mutual 630 management agreement. The state board shall consult with 631 education stakeholders in developing the rules. 632 Section 15.âParagraph (e) is added to subsection (2) of 633 section 1010.20, Florida Statutes, to read: 634 1010.20âCost accounting and reporting for school 635 districts.â 636 (2)âCOST REPORTING.â 637 (e)âEach charter school shall receive and respond to 638 monitoring questions from the department. 639 Section 16.âSubsections (2) and (4) of section 1011.035, 640 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 641 1011.035âSchool district fiscal transparency.â 642 (2)âEach district school board shall post on its website: 643 (a)âA plain language version of each proposed, tentative, 644 and official budget which describes each budget item in terms 645 that are easily understandable to the public and includes: 646 (a)âGraphical representations, for each public school 647 within the district and for the school district, of the 648 following: 649 1.âSummary financial efficiency data. 650 2.âFiscal trend information for the previous 3 years on: 651 a.âThe ratio of full-time equivalent students to full-time 652 equivalent instructional personnel. 653 b.âThe ratio of full-time equivalent students to full-time 654 equivalent administrative personnel. 655 c.âThe total operating expenditures per full-time 656 equivalent student. 657 d.âThe total instructional expenditures per full-time 658 equivalent student. 659 e.âThe general administrative expenditures as a percentage 660 of total budget. 661 f.âThe rate of change in the general fundâs ending fund 662 balance not classified as restricted. 663 (b)âA link to the web-based fiscal transparency tool 664 developed by the department pursuant to s. 1010.20 to enable 665 taxpayers to evaluate the financial efficiency of the school 666 district and compare the financial efficiency of the school 667 district with other similarly situated school districts. 668 669 This information must be prominently posted on the school 670 districtâs website in a manner that is readily accessible to the 671 public. 672 (4)âThe website should contain links to: 673 (a)âHelp explain or provide background information on 674 various budget items that are required by state or federal law. 675 (b)âAllow users to navigate to related sites to view 676 supporting details. 677 (c)âenable taxpayers, parents, and education advocates to 678 send e-mails asking questions about the budget and enable others 679 to view the questions and responses. 680 Section 17.â Subsection (1) of section 1011.14, Florida 681 Statutes, is amended to read: 682 1011.14âObligations for a period of 1 year.âDistrict school 683 boards are authorized only under the following conditions to 684 create obligations by way of anticipation of budgeted revenues 685 accruing on a current basis without pledging the credit of the 686 district or requiring future levy of taxes for certain purposes 687 for a period of 1 year; however, such obligations may be 688 extended from year to year with the consent of the lender for a 689 period not to exceed 4 years, or for a total of 5 years 690 including the initial year of the loan: 691 (1)âPURPOSES.âThe purposes for which such obligations may 692 be incurred within the intent of this section shall include only 693 the purchase of school buses, land, and equipment for 694 educational purposes; the erection of, alteration to, or 695 addition to educational plants, ancillary plants, and auxiliary 696 facilities; and the adjustment of insurance on educational 697 property on a 5-year plan, as provided by rules of the State 698 Board of Education. 699 Section 18.âSubsection (2) of section 1011.60, Florida 700 Statutes, is amended to read: 701 1011.60âMinimum requirements of the Florida Education 702 Finance Program.âEach district which participates in the state 703 appropriations for the Florida Education Finance Program shall 704 provide evidence of its effort to maintain an adequate school 705 program throughout the district and shall meet at least the 706 following requirements: 707 (2)âMINIMUM TERM.âOperate all schools for a term of 180 708 actual teaching days or the equivalent on an hourly basis as 709 specified by rules of the State Board of Education each school 710 year. The State Board of Education may prescribe procedures for 711 altering, and, upon written application, may alter, this 712 requirement during a national, state, or local emergency as it 713 may apply to an individual school or schools in any district or 714 districts if the district school board certifies to the 715 Commissioner of Education that, in the opinion of the board, it 716 is not necessary feasible to make up lost days or hours, and the 717 apportionment may, at the discretion of the Commissioner of 718 Education and if the board determines that the reduction of 719 school days or hours is caused by the existence of a bona fide 720 emergency, be reduced for such district or districts in 721 proportion to the decrease in the length of term in any such 722 school or schools. A strike, as defined in s. 447.203(6), by 723 employees of the school district may not be considered an 724 emergency. 725 Section 19.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 726 1011.6202, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 727 1011.6202âPrincipal Autonomy Program Initiative.âThe 728 Principal Autonomy Program Initiative is created within the 729 Department of Education. The purpose of the program is to 730 provide a highly effective principal of a participating school 731 with increased autonomy and authority to operate his or her 732 school, as well as other schools, in a way that produces 733 significant improvements in student achievement and school 734 management while complying with constitutional requirements. The 735 State Board of Education may, upon approval of a principal 736 autonomy proposal, enter into a performance contract with the 737 district school board for participation in the program. 738 (3)âEXEMPTION FROM LAWS.â 739 (b)âA participating school or a school operated by a 740 principal pursuant to subsection (5) shall comply with the 741 provisions of chapters 1000-1013, and rules of the state board 742 that implement those provisions, pertaining to the following: 743 1.âThose laws relating to the election and compensation of 744 district school board members, the election or appointment and 745 compensation of district school superintendents, public meetings 746 and public records requirements, financial disclosure, and 747 conflicts of interest. 748 2.âThose laws relating to the student assessment program 749 and school grading system, including chapter 1008. 750 3.âThose laws relating to the provision of services to 751 students with disabilities. 752 4.âThose laws relating to civil rights, including s. 753 1000.05, relating to discrimination. 754 5.âThose laws relating to student health, safety, and 755 welfare. 756 6.âSection 1001.42(4)(f), relating to the uniform opening 757 date for public schools. 758 7.âSection 1003.03, governing maximum class size, except 759 that the calculation for compliance pursuant to s. 1003.03 is 760 the average at the school level for a participating school. 761 8.âSections 1012.22(1)(c) and 1012.27(2), relating to 762 compensation and salary schedules. 763 9.âSection 1012.33(5), relating to workforce reductions for 764 annual contracts for instructional personnel. This subparagraph 765 does not apply to at-will employees. 766 10.âSection 1012.335, relating to annual or instructional 767 multiyear contracts for instructional personnel hired on or 768 after July 1, 2011. This subparagraph does not apply to at-will 769 employees. 770 11.âSection 1012.34, relating to personnel evaluation 771 procedures and criteria. 772 12.âThose laws pertaining to educational facilities, 773 including chapter 1013, except that s. 1013.20, relating to 774 covered walkways for relocatables, is eligible for exemption. 775 13.âThose laws pertaining to participating school 776 districts, including this section and ss. 1011.69(2) and 777 1012.28(8). 778 Section 20.âSubsection (4) of section 1011.69, Florida 779 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (5) is added to that 780 section, to read: 781 1011.69âEquity in School-Level Funding Act.â 782 (4)âAfter providing Title I, Part A, Basic funds to schools 783 above the 75 percent poverty threshold, which may include high 784 schools above the 50 percent threshold as permitted by federal 785 law, school districts shall provide any remaining Title I, Part 786 A, Basic funds directly to all eligible schools as provided in 787 this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, an eligible 788 school is a school that is eligible to receive Title I funds, 789 including a charter school. The threshold for identifying 790 eligible schools may not exceed the threshold established by a 791 school district for the 2016-2017 school year or the statewide 792 percentage of economically disadvantaged students, as determined 793 annually. 794 (a)âPrior to the allocation of Title I funds to eligible 795 schools, a school district may withhold funds only as follows: 796 1.âOne percent for parent involvement, in addition to the 797 one percent the district must reserve under federal law for 798 allocations to eligible schools for parent involvement; 799 2.âA necessary and reasonable amount for administration 800 which includes the districtâs indirect cost rate, not to exceed 801 a total of 10 percent; 802 3.âA reasonable and necessary amount to provide: 803 a.âHomeless programs; 804 b.âDelinquent and neglected programs; 805 c.âPrekindergarten programs and activities; 806 d.âPrivate school equitable services; and 807 e.âTransportation for foster care children to their school 808 of origin or choice programs; 809 4.âUp to 5 percent to provide financial incentives and 810 rewards to teachers who serve students in eligible schools, 811 including charter schools, identified for comprehensive support 812 and improvement activities or targeted support and improvement 813 activities, for the purpose of attracting and retaining 814 qualified and effective teachers, including teachers of any 815 subject or grade level for whom a measurement under s. 816 1012.34(7) or a state-approved Alternative Student Growth Model 817 is unavailable; and 818 5.4.âA necessary and reasonable amount, not to exceed 1 819 percent, for eligible schools, including charter schools, to 820 provide educational services in accordance with the approved 821 Title I plan. Such educational services may include the 822 provision of STEM curricula, instructional materials, and 823 related learning technologies that support academic achievement 824 in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics in Title I 825 schools, including, but not limited to, technologies related to 826 drones, coding, animation, artificial intelligence, 827 cybersecurity, data science, the engineering design process, 828 mobile development, and robotics. Funds may be reserved under 829 this subparagraph only to the extent that all required 830 reservations under federal law have been met and that such 831 reservation does not reduce school-level allocations below the 832 levels required under federal law. 833 (b)âAll remaining Title I funds shall be distributed to all 834 eligible schools in accordance with federal law and regulation. 835 An eligible school may use funds under this subsection to 836 participate in discretionary educational services provided by 837 the school district. Any funds provided by an eligible school to 838 participate in discretionary educational services provided by 839 the school district are not subject to the requirements of this 840 subsection. 841 (c)âAny funds carried forward by the school district are 842 not subject to the requirements of this subsection. 843 (5)âThe Department of Education shall make funds from Title 844 I, Title II, and Title III programs available to local education 845 agencies for the full period of availability provided in federal 846 law. 847 Section 21.âSubsections (2) through (6) of section 1011.71, 848 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 849 1011.71âDistrict school tax.â 850 (2)âIn addition to the maximum millage levy as provided in 851 subsection (1), each school board may levy not more than 1.5 852 mills against the taxable value for school purposes for charter 853 schools pursuant to s. 1013.62(1) and (3) and for district 854 schools for operational or capital purposes. to fund: 855 (a)âNew construction, remodeling projects, sites and site 856 improvement or expansion to new sites, existing sites, auxiliary 857 facilities, athletic facilities, or ancillary facilities. 858 (b)âMaintenance, renovation, and repair of existing school 859 plants or of leased facilities to correct deficiencies pursuant 860 to s. 1013.15(2). 861 (c)âThe purchase, lease-purchase, or lease of school buses. 862 (d)âThe purchase, lease-purchase, or lease of new and 863 replacement equipment; computer and device hardware and 864 operating system software necessary for gaining access to or 865 enhancing the use of electronic and digital instructional 866 content and resources; and enterprise resource software 867 applications that are classified as capital assets in accordance 868 with definitions of the Governmental Accounting Standards Board, 869 have a useful life of at least 5 years, and are used to support 870 districtwide administration or state-mandated reporting 871 requirements. Enterprise resource software may be acquired by 872 annual license fees, maintenance fees, or lease agreements. 873 (e)âPayments for educational facilities and sites due under 874 a lease-purchase agreement entered into by a district school 875 board pursuant to s. 1003.02(1)(f) or s. 1013.15(2), not 876 exceeding, in the aggregate, an amount equal to three-fourths of 877 the proceeds from the millage levied by a district school board 878 pursuant to this subsection. The three-fourths limit is waived 879 for lease-purchase agreements entered into before June 30, 2009, 880 by a district school board pursuant to this paragraph. If 881 payments under lease-purchase agreements in the aggregate, 882 including lease-purchase agreements entered into before June 30, 883 2009, exceed three-fourths of the proceeds from the millage 884 levied pursuant to this subsection, the district school board 885 may not withhold the administrative fees authorized by s. 886 1002.33(20) from any charter school operating in the school 887 district. 888 (f)âPayment of loans approved pursuant to ss. 1011.14 and 889 1011.15. 890 (g)âPayment of costs directly related to complying with 891 state and federal environmental statutes, rules, and regulations 892 governing school facilities. 893 (h)âPayment of costs of leasing relocatable educational 894 facilities, of renting or leasing educational facilities and 895 sites pursuant to s. 1013.15(2), or of renting or leasing 896 buildings or space within existing buildings pursuant to s. 897 1013.15(4). 898 (i)âPayment of the cost of school buses when a school 899 district contracts with a private entity to provide student 900 transportation services if the district meets the requirements 901 of this paragraph. 902 1.âThe districtâs contract must require that the private 903 entity purchase, lease-purchase, or lease, and operate and 904 maintain, one or more school buses of a specific type and size 905 that meet the requirements of s. 1006.25. 906 2.âEach such school bus must be used for the daily 907 transportation of public school students in the manner required 908 by the school district. 909 3.âAnnual payment for each such school bus may not exceed 910 10 percent of the purchase price of the state pool bid. 911 4.âThe proposed expenditure of the funds for this purpose 912 must have been included in the district school boardâs notice of 913 proposed tax for school capital outlay as provided in s. 914 200.065(10). 915 (j)âPayment of the cost of the opening day collection for 916 the library media center of a new school. 917 (k)âPayment of salaries and benefits for employees whose 918 job duties support activities funded by this subsection. 919 (3)âNotwithstanding subsection (2), if the revenue from 1.5 920 mills is insufficient to meet the payments due under a lease 921 purchase agreement entered into before June 30, 2009, by a 922 district school board pursuant to paragraph (2)(e), or to meet 923 other critical district fixed capital outlay needs, the board, 924 in addition to the 1.5 mills, may levy up to 0.25 mills for 925 fixed capital outlay in lieu of levying an equivalent amount of 926 the discretionary mills for operations as provided in the 927 General Appropriations Act. Millage levied pursuant to this 928 subsection is subject to the provisions of s. 200.065 and, 929 combined with the 1.5 mills authorized in subsection (2), may 930 not exceed 1.75 mills. If the district chooses to use up to 0.25 931 mills for fixed capital outlay, the compression adjustment 932 pursuant to s. 1011.62(5) shall be calculated for the standard 933 discretionary millage that is not eligible for transfer to 934 capital outlay. 935 (4)âIf the revenue from the millage authorized in 936 subsection (2) is insufficient to make payments due under a 937 lease-purchase agreement entered into prior to June 30, 2008, by 938 a district school board pursuant to paragraph (2)(e), an amount 939 up to 0.5 mills of the taxable value for school purposes within 940 the school district shall be legally available for such 941 payments, notwithstanding other restrictions on the use of such 942 revenues imposed by law. 943 (5)âA school district may expend, subject to s. 200.065, up 944 to $200 per unweighted full-time equivalent student from the 945 revenue generated by the millage levy authorized by subsection 946 (2) to fund, in addition to expenditures authorized in 947 paragraphs (2)(a)-(j), expenses for the following: 948 (a)âThe purchase, lease-purchase, or lease of driverâs 949 education vehicles; motor vehicles used for the maintenance or 950 operation of plants and equipment; security vehicles; or 951 vehicles used in storing or distributing materials and 952 equipment. 953 (b)âPayment of the cost of premiums, as defined in s. 954 627.403, for property and casualty insurance necessary to insure 955 school district educational and ancillary plants. As used in 956 this paragraph, casualty insurance has the same meaning as in s. 957 624.605(1)(b), (d), (f), (g), (h), and (m). Operating revenues 958 that are made available through the payment of property and 959 casualty insurance premiums from revenues generated under this 960 subsection may be expended only for nonrecurring operational 961 expenditures of the school district. 962 (6)âViolations of the expenditure provisions in subsection 963 (2) or subsection (5) shall result in an equal dollar reduction 964 in the Florida Education Finance Program (FEFP) funds for the 965 violating district in the fiscal year following the audit 966 citation. 967 Section 22.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) and paragraph 968 (a) of subsection (3) of section 1012.22, Florida Statutes, are 969 amended to read: 970 1012.22âPublic school personnel; powers and duties of the 971 district school board.âThe district school board shall: 972 (1)âDesignate positions to be filled, prescribe 973 qualifications for those positions, and provide for the 974 appointment, compensation, promotion, suspension, and dismissal 975 of employees as follows, subject to the requirements of this 976 chapter: 977 (c)âCompensation and salary schedules.â 978 1.âDefinitions.âAs used in this paragraph: 979 a.ââAdjustmentâ means an addition to the base salary 980 schedule that is not a bonus and becomes part of the employeeâs 981 permanent base salary and shall be considered compensation under 982 s. 121.021(22). 983 b.ââGrandfathered salary scheduleâ means the salary 984 schedule or schedules adopted by a district school board before 985 July 1, 2014, pursuant to subparagraph 4. 986 c.ââInstructional personnelâ means instructional personnel 987 as defined in s. 1012.01(2)(a)-(d), excluding substitute 988 teachers. 989 d.ââPerformance salary scheduleâ means the salary schedule 990 or schedules adopted by a district school board pursuant to 991 subparagraph 5. 992 e.ââSalary scheduleâ means the schedule or schedules used 993 to provide the base salary for district school board personnel. 994 f.ââSchool administratorâ means a school administrator as 995 defined in s. 1012.01(3)(c). 996 g.ââSupplementâ means an annual addition to the base salary 997 for the term of the negotiated supplement as long as the 998 employee continues his or her employment for the purpose of the 999 supplement. A supplement does not become part of the employeeâs 1000 continuing base salary but shall be considered compensation 1001 under s. 121.021(22). 1002 2.âCost-of-living adjustment.âA district school board may 1003 provide a cost-of-living salary adjustment if the adjustment: 1004 a.âDoes not discriminate among comparable classes of 1005 employees based upon the salary schedule under which they are 1006 compensated. 1007 b.âDoes not exceed 50 percent of the annual adjustment 1008 provided to instructional personnel rated as effective. 1009 3.âAdvanced degrees.âA district school board may use 1010 advanced degrees in setting a salary schedule for instructional 1011 personnel or school administrators if the advanced degree is 1012 held in the individualâs area of certification, a field related 1013 to his or her teaching assignment, or a related field of study. 1014 For the purposes of the salary schedule, an advanced degree may 1015 include a masterâs degree or higher in the area of certification 1016 or teaching assignment, or an advanced degree in another field 1017 with a minimum of 18 graduate semester hours related to the area 1018 of certification or teaching assignment. 1019 4.âGrandfathered salary schedule.â 1020 a.âThe district school board shall adopt a salary schedule 1021 or salary schedules to be used as the basis for paying all 1022 school employees hired before July 1, 2014. Instructional 1023 personnel on annual contract as of July 1, 2014, shall be placed 1024 on the performance salary schedule adopted under subparagraph 4. 1025 5. Instructional personnel on continuing contract or 1026 professional service contract may opt into the performance 1027 salary schedule if the employee relinquishes such contract and 1028 agrees to be employed on an annual contract under s. 1012.335. 1029 Such an employee shall be placed on the performance salary 1030 schedule and may not return to continuing contract or 1031 professional service contract status. Any employee who opts into 1032 the performance salary schedule may not return to the 1033 grandfathered salary schedule. 1034 b.âIn determining the grandfathered salary schedule for 1035 instructional personnel, a district school board must base a 1036 portion of each employeeâs compensation upon performance 1037 demonstrated under s. 1012.34 and shall provide differentiated 1038 pay for both instructional personnel and school administrators 1039 based upon district-determined factors, including, but not 1040 limited to, additional responsibilities, school demographics, 1041 high-demand teacher needs areas, and level of job performance 1042 difficulties. 1043 5.âPerformance salary schedule.âBy July 1, 2014, the 1044 district school board shall adopt a performance salary schedule 1045 that provides annual salary adjustments for instructional 1046 personnel and school administrators based upon performance 1047 determined under s. 1012.34. Employees hired on or after July 1, 1048 2014, or employees who choose to move from the grandfathered 1049 salary schedule to the performance salary schedule shall be 1050 compensated pursuant to the performance salary schedule once 1051 they have received the appropriate performance evaluation for 1052 this purpose. 1053 a.âBase salary.âThe base salary shall be established as 1054 follows: 1055 (I)âThe base salary for instructional personnel or school 1056 administrators who opt into the performance salary schedule 1057 shall be the salary paid in the prior year, including 1058 adjustments only. 1059 (II)âInstructional personnel or school administrators new 1060 to the district, returning to the district after a break in 1061 service without an authorized leave of absence, or appointed for 1062 the first time to a position in the district in the capacity of 1063 instructional personnel or school administrator shall be placed 1064 on the performance salary schedule. 1065 b.âSalary adjustments.âSalary adjustments for highly 1066 effective or effective performance shall be established as 1067 follows: 1068 (I)âThe annual salary adjustment under the performance 1069 salary schedule for an employee rated as highly effective must 1070 be at least 25 percent greater than the highest annual salary 1071 adjustment available to an employee of the same classification 1072 through any other salary schedule adopted by the district. 1073 (II)âThe annual salary adjustment under the performance 1074 salary schedule for an employee rated as effective must be equal 1075 to at least 50 percent and no more than 75 percent of the annual 1076 adjustment provided for a highly effective employee of the same 1077 classification. 1078 (III)âA salary schedule may shall not provide an annual 1079 salary adjustment for an employee who receives a rating other 1080 than highly effective or effective for the year. 1081 c.âSalary supplements.âIn addition to the salary 1082 adjustments, each district school board shall provide for salary 1083 supplements for activities that must include, but are not 1084 limited to: 1085 (I)âAssignment to a Title I eligible school. 1086 (II)âAssignment to a school that earned a grade of âFâ or 1087 three consecutive grades of âDâ pursuant to s. 1008.34 such that 1088 the supplement remains in force for at least 1 year following 1089 improved performance in that school. 1090 (III)âCertification and teaching in high-demand teacher 1091 needs areas. Statewide high-demand teacher needs areas shall be 1092 identified by the State Board of Education under s. 1012.07. 1093 However, the district school board may identify other areas of 1094 high-demand needs within the school district for purposes of 1095 this sub-sub-subparagraph and may remove areas identified by the 1096 state board which do not apply within the school district. 1097 (IV)âAssignment of additional academic responsibilities. 1098 1099 If budget constraints in any given year limit a district school 1100 boardâs ability to fully fund all adopted salary schedules, the 1101 performance salary schedule may shall not be reduced on the 1102 basis of total cost or the value of individual awards in a 1103 manner that is proportionally greater than reductions to any 1104 other salary schedules adopted by the district. Any compensation 1105 for longevity of service awarded to instructional personnel who 1106 are on any other salary schedule must be included in calculating 1107 the salary adjustments required by sub-subparagraph b. 1108 (3)(a)âCollective bargaining.âNotwithstanding provisions of 1109 chapter 447 related to district school board collective 1110 bargaining, collective bargaining may not preclude a district 1111 school board from carrying out its constitutional and statutory 1112 duties related to the following: 1113 1.âProviding incentives to effective and highly effective 1114 teachers. 1115 2.âImplementing intervention and support strategies under 1116 s. 1008.33 to address the causes of low student performance and 1117 improve student academic performance and attendance. 1118 3.âImplementing student discipline provisions required by 1119 law, including a review of a studentâs abilities, past 1120 performance, behavior, and needs. 1121 4.âImplementing school safety plans and requirements. 1122 5.âImplementing staff and student recognition programs. 1123 6.âDistributing correspondence to parents, teachers, and 1124 community members related to the daily operation of schools and 1125 the district. 1126 7.âProviding any required notice or copies of information 1127 related to the district school board or district operations 1128 which is readily available on the school districtâs website. 1129 8.âThe school districtâs calendar. 1130 9.âProviding salary supplements pursuant to sub-sub 1131 subparagraph (1)(c)5.c.(III). 1132 Section 23.âPresent paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 1133 (1) of section 1012.335, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 1134 paragraphs (c) and (d), respectively, a new paragraph (b) is 1135 added to that subsection, paragraphs (d), (e), and (f) are added 1136 to subsection (2) of that section, and subsections (3) and (4) 1137 of that section are amended, to read: 1138 1012.335âContracts with instructional personnel hired on or 1139 after July 1, 2011.â 1140 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 1141 (b)ââInstructional multiyear contract,â beginning July 1, 1142 2026, means an employment contract for a period not to exceed 3 1143 years which the district school board may choose to award to 1144 instructional personnel upon completion of a probationary 1145 contract and at least one annual contract. 1146 (2)âEMPLOYMENT.â 1147 (d)âAn instructional multiyear contract may be awarded, 1148 beginning July 1, 2026, only if the employee: 1149 1.âHolds an active professional certificate issued pursuant 1150 to s. 1012.56 and rules of the State Board of Education; 1151 2.âHas been recommended by the district school 1152 superintendent for the instructional multiyear contract based 1153 upon the individualâs evaluation under s. 1012.34 and approved 1154 by the district school board; and 1155 3.âHas not received an annual performance evaluation rating 1156 of unsatisfactory or needs improvement in the past 3 years under 1157 s. 1012.34. 1158 (e)âAn employee awarded an instructional multiyear contract 1159 who receives an annual performance evaluation rating of 1160 unsatisfactory or needs improvement under s. 1012.34 must be 1161 returned to an annual contract in the following school year. 1162 Such evaluation rating must be included with the evaluation 1163 ratings under subsequent annual contracts for determinations of 1164 just cause under s. 1012.33. 1165 (f)âThe award of an instructional multiyear contract does 1166 not remove the authority of the district school superintendent 1167 to reassign a teacher during the term of the contract. 1168 (3)âVIOLATION OF ANNUAL OR INSTRUCTIONAL MULTIYEAR 1169 CONTRACT.âInstructional personnel who accept a written offer 1170 from the district school board and who leave their positions 1171 without prior release from the district school board are subject 1172 to the jurisdiction of the Education Practices Commission. 1173 (4)âSUSPENSION OR DISMISSAL OF INSTRUCTIONAL PERSONNEL ON 1174 ANNUAL OR INSTRUCTIONAL MULTIYEAR CONTRACT.âAny instructional 1175 personnel with an annual or instructional multiyear contract may 1176 be suspended or dismissed at any time during the term of the 1177 contract for just cause as provided in subsection (5). The 1178 district school board shall notify the employee in writing 1179 whenever charges are made and may suspend such person without 1180 pay. However, if the charges are not sustained, the employee 1181 must shall be immediately reinstated and his or her back pay 1182 must shall be paid. If the employee wishes to contest the 1183 charges, he or she must, within 15 days after receipt of the 1184 written notice, submit a written request for a hearing to the 1185 district school board. A direct hearing must shall be conducted 1186 by the district school board or a subcommittee thereof within 60 1187 days after receipt of the written appeal. The hearing must shall 1188 be conducted in accordance with ss. 120.569 and 120.57. A 1189 majority vote of the membership of the district school board 1190 shall be required to sustain the district school 1191 superintendentâs recommendation. The district school boardâs 1192 determination is final as to the sufficiency or insufficiency of 1193 the grounds for suspension without pay or dismissal. Any such 1194 decision adverse to the employee may be appealed by the employee 1195 pursuant to s. 120.68. 1196 Section 24.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 1197 1012.39, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1198 1012.39âEmployment of substitute teachers, teachers of 1199 adult education, nondegreed teachers of career education, and 1200 career specialists and nondegreed teachers of fine and 1201 performing arts; students performing clinical field experience.â 1202 (1)âNotwithstanding ss. 1012.32, 1012.55, 1012.56, and 1203 1012.57, or any other provision of law or rule to the contrary, 1204 each district school board shall establish the minimal 1205 qualifications for: 1206 (c)âPart-time and full-time nondegreed teachers of career 1207 programs. Qualifications must be established for nondegreed 1208 teachers of career and technical education courses for program 1209 clusters that are recognized in the state and are based 1210 primarily on successful occupational experience rather than 1211 academic training. The qualifications for such teachers must 1212 require: 1213 1.âThe filing of a complete set of fingerprints in the same 1214 manner as required by s. 1012.32. Faculty employed solely to 1215 conduct postsecondary instruction may be exempted from this 1216 requirement. 1217 2.âDocumentation of education and successful occupational 1218 experience, including documentation of: 1219 a.âA high school diploma or the equivalent. 1220 b.âCompletion of a minimum level, established by the 1221 district school board, 3 years of full-time successful 1222 occupational experience or the equivalent of part-time 1223 experience in the teaching specialization area. The district 1224 school board may establish alternative qualifications for 1225 teachers with an industry certification in the career area in 1226 which they teach. 1227 c.âFor full-time teachers, completion of professional 1228 education training in teaching methods, course construction, 1229 lesson planning and evaluation, and teaching special needs 1230 students. This training may be completed through coursework from 1231 an accredited or approved institution or an approved district 1232 teacher education program, or the local school district 1233 inservice master plan. 1234 d.âDocumentation of industry certification when state or 1235 national industry certifications are available and applicable. 1236 Section 25.âParagraphs (a), (b), (d), and (e) of subsection 1237 (2) of section 1012.555, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1238 1012.555âTeacher Apprenticeship Program.â 1239 (2)(a)âAn individual must meet the following minimum 1240 eligibility requirements to participate in the apprenticeship 1241 program: 1242 1.âBe enrolled in or have completed Have received an 1243 associate degree program at from an accredited postsecondary 1244 institution. 1245 2.âHave earned a cumulative grade point average of 2.5 in 1246 that degree program. 1247 3.âHave successfully passed a background screening as 1248 provided in s. 1012.32. 1249 4.âHave received a temporary apprenticeship certificate as 1250 provided in s. 1012.56(7)(d). 1251 (b)âAs a condition of participating in the program, an 1252 apprentice teacher must commit to spending at least the first 2 1253 years in the classroom of a mentor teacher using team teaching 1254 strategies identified in s. 1003.03(4)(b) s. 1003.03(5)(b) and 1255 fulfilling the on-the-job training component of the registered 1256 apprenticeship and its associated standards. 1257 (d)âAn apprentice teacher must be appointed by the district 1258 school board or work in the district as an education 1259 paraprofessional and must be paid in accordance with s. 446.032 1260 and rules adopted by the State Board of Education. 1261 (e)âAn apprentice teacher may change schools or districts 1262 after the first year of his or her apprenticeship if the 1263 receiving hiring school or district has agreed to fund the 1264 remaining year of the apprenticeship. 1265 Section 26.âParagraph (g) of subsection (2), subsection 1266 (7), and paragraph (a) of subsection (8) of section 1012.56, 1267 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1268 1012.56âEducator certification requirements.â 1269 (2)âELIGIBILITY CRITERIA.âTo be eligible to seek 1270 certification, a person must: 1271 (g)âDemonstrate mastery of general knowledge pursuant to 1272 subsection (3), if the person serves as a classroom teacher as 1273 defined in s. 1012.01(2)(a). 1274 (7)âTYPES AND TERMS OF CERTIFICATION.â 1275 (a)âThe Department of Education shall issue a professional 1276 certificate for a period not to exceed 5 years to any applicant 1277 who fulfills one of the following: 1278 1.âMeets all the applicable requirements outlined in 1279 subsection (2). 1280 2.âFor a professional certificate covering grades 6 through 1281 12: 1282 a.âMeets the applicable requirements of paragraphs (2)(a) 1283 (h). 1284 b.âHolds a masterâs or higher degree in the area of 1285 science, technology, engineering, or mathematics. 1286 c.âTeaches a high school course in the subject of the 1287 advanced degree. 1288 d.âIs rated highly effective as determined by the teacherâs 1289 performance evaluation under s. 1012.34, based in part on 1290 student performance as measured by a statewide, standardized 1291 assessment or an Advanced Placement, Advanced International 1292 Certificate of Education, or International Baccalaureate 1293 examination. 1294 e.âAchieves a passing score on the Florida professional 1295 education competency examination required by state board rule. 1296 3.âMeets the applicable requirements of paragraphs (2)(a) 1297 (h) and completes a professional learning certification program 1298 approved by the department pursuant to paragraph (8)(c) or an 1299 educator preparation institute approved by the department 1300 pursuant to s. 1004.85. An applicant who completes one of these 1301 programs and is rated highly effective as determined by his or 1302 her performance evaluation under s. 1012.34 is not required to 1303 take or achieve a passing score on the professional education 1304 competency examination in order to be awarded a professional 1305 certificate. 1306 (b)âThe department shall issue a temporary certificate to 1307 any applicant who: 1308 1.âCompletes the requirements outlined in paragraphs 1309 (2)(a)-(f) and completes the subject area content requirements 1310 specified in state board rule or demonstrates mastery of subject 1311 area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5) and holds an 1312 accredited degree or a degree approved by the Department of 1313 Education at the level required for the subject area 1314 specialization in state board rule; 1315 2.âFor a subject area specialization for which the state 1316 board otherwise requires a bachelorâs degree, documents 48 1317 months of active-duty military service with an honorable 1318 discharge or a medical separation; completes the requirements 1319 outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b), and (d)-(f); completes the 1320 subject area content requirements specified in state board rule 1321 or demonstrates mastery of subject area knowledge pursuant to 1322 subsection (5); and documents completion of 60 college credits 1323 with a minimum cumulative grade point average of 2.5 on a 4.0 1324 scale, as provided by one or more accredited institutions of 1325 higher learning or a nonaccredited institution of higher 1326 learning identified by the Department of Education as having a 1327 quality program resulting in a bachelorâs degree or higher; or 1328 3.âIs enrolled in a state-approved teacher preparation 1329 program under s. 1004.04; is actively completing the required 1330 program field experience or internship at a public school; 1331 completes the requirements outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b), 1332 and (d)-(f); completes the subject area content requirements 1333 specified in state board rule or demonstrates mastery of subject 1334 area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5); and documents 1335 completion of 60 college credits with a minimum cumulative grade 1336 point average of 2.5 on a 4.0 scale, as provided by one or more 1337 accredited institutions of higher learning or a nonaccredited 1338 institution of higher learning identified by the Department of 1339 Education as having a quality program resulting in a bachelorâs 1340 degree or higher. 1341 (c)âThe department shall issue one nonrenewable 2-year 1342 temporary certificate and one nonrenewable 5-year professional 1343 certificate to a qualified applicant who holds a bachelorâs 1344 degree in the area of speech-language impairment to allow for 1345 completion of a masterâs degree program in speech-language 1346 impairment. 1347 (d)âThe department shall issue a temporary apprenticeship 1348 certificate to any applicant who meets the requirements of 1349 paragraphs (2)(a), (b), and (d)-(f). 1350 (e)âA person who is issued a temporary certificate under 1351 paragraph (b) must be assigned a teacher mentor for a minimum of 1352 2 school years after commencing employment. Each teacher mentor 1353 selected by the school district, charter school, or charter 1354 management organization must: 1355 1.âHold a valid professional certificate issued pursuant to 1356 this section; 1357 2.âHave earned at least 3 years of teaching experience in 1358 prekindergarten through grade 12; and 1359 3.âHave earned an effective or highly effective rating on 1360 the prior yearâs performance evaluation under s. 1012.34. 1361 (f)1.âA temporary certificate is valid for 5 school fiscal 1362 years, is limited to a one-time issuance, and is nonrenewable. 1363 2.âA temporary apprenticeship certificate issued under 1364 paragraph (d) is valid for 5 school years, may be issued only 1365 once, and is nonrenewable. 1366 (g)âA certificateholder may request that her or his 1367 certificate be placed in an inactive status. A certificate that 1368 has been inactive may be reactivated upon application to the 1369 department. The department shall prescribe, by rule, 1370 professional learning requirements as a condition of 1371 reactivating a certificate that has been inactive for more than 1372 1 year. 1373 (h)âA school district or a regional education consortium 1374 may issue temporary certificates, based on the requirements in 1375 paragraph (b). School districts and regional education consortia 1376 shall report the number of such certificates issued, and any 1377 additional information, to the department, based on reporting 1378 requirements adopted by the State Board of Education. Such 1379 certificates are subject to the authority of the Education 1380 Practices Commission under s. 1012.795. 1381 1382 At least 1 year before an individualâs department-issued 1383 temporary certificate is set to expire, the department shall 1384 electronically notify the individual of the date on which his or 1385 her certificate will expire and provide a list of each method by 1386 which the qualifications for a professional certificate can be 1387 completed. 1388 (8)âPROFESSIONAL LEARNING CERTIFICATION PROGRAM.â 1389 (a)âThe Department of Education shall develop and each 1390 school district, charter school, and charter management 1391 organization may provide a cohesive competency-based 1392 professional learning certification program by which 1393 instructional staff may satisfy the mastery of professional 1394 preparation and education competence requirements specified in 1395 subsection (6) and rules of the State Board of Education. 1396 Participants must hold a state-issued temporary certificate. A 1397 school district, charter school, or charter management 1398 organization that implements the program shall provide a 1399 competency-based certification program developed by the 1400 Department of Education or developed by the district, charter 1401 school, or charter management organization and approved by the 1402 Department of Education. These entities may collaborate with 1403 other supporting agencies or educational entities for 1404 implementation. The program shall include the following: 1405 1.âA teacher mentorship and induction component. 1406 a.âEach individual selected by the district, charter 1407 school, or charter management organization as a mentor: 1408 (I)âMust hold a valid professional certificate issued 1409 pursuant to this section; 1410 (II)âMust have earned at least 3 years of teaching 1411 experience in prekindergarten through grade 12; 1412 (III)âMust have completed training in clinical supervision 1413 and participate in ongoing mentor training provided through the 1414 coordinated system of professional learning under s. 1012.98(4); 1415 (IV)âMust have earned an effective or highly effective 1416 rating on the prior yearâs performance evaluation; and 1417 (V)âMay be a peer evaluator under the districtâs evaluation 1418 system approved under s. 1012.34. 1419 b.âThe teacher mentorship and induction component must, at 1420 a minimum, provide routine opportunities for mentoring and 1421 induction activities, including ongoing professional learning as 1422 described in s. 1012.98 targeted to a teacherâs needs, 1423 opportunities for a teacher to observe other teachers, co 1424 teaching experiences, and reflection and follow-up followup 1425 discussions. Professional learning must meet the criteria 1426 established in s. 1012.98(3). Mentorship and induction 1427 activities must be provided for an applicantâs first year in the 1428 program and may be provided until the applicant attains his or 1429 her professional certificate in accordance with this section. 1430 2.âAn assessment of teaching performance aligned to the 1431 districtâs, charter schoolâs, or charter management 1432 organizationâs system for personnel evaluation under s. 1012.34 1433 which provides for: 1434 a.âAn initial evaluation of each educatorâs competencies to 1435 determine an appropriate individualized professional learning 1436 plan. 1437 b.âA summative evaluation to assure successful completion 1438 of the program. 1439 3.âProfessional education preparation content knowledge, 1440 which must be included in the mentoring and induction activities 1441 under subparagraph 1., that includes, but is not limited to, the 1442 following: 1443 a.âThe state academic standards provided under s. 1003.41, 1444 including scientifically researched and evidence-based reading 1445 instructional strategies grounded in the science of reading, 1446 content literacy, and mathematical practices, for each subject 1447 identified on the temporary certificate. Reading instructional 1448 strategies for foundational skills shall include phonics 1449 instruction for decoding and encoding as the primary 1450 instructional strategy for word reading. Instructional 1451 strategies may not employ the three-cueing system model of 1452 reading or visual memory as a basis for teaching word reading. 1453 Instructional strategies may include visual information and 1454 strategies which improve background and experiential knowledge, 1455 add context, and increase oral language and vocabulary to 1456 support comprehension, but may not be used to teach word 1457 reading. 1458 b.âThe educator-accomplished practices approved by the 1459 state board. 1460 4.âRequired achievement of passing scores on the subject 1461 area and professional education competency examination required 1462 by State Board of Education rule. Mastery of general knowledge 1463 must be demonstrated as described in subsection (3). 1464 5.âBeginning with candidates entering a program in the 1465 2022-2023 school year, a candidate for certification in a 1466 coverage area identified pursuant to s. 1012.585(3)(g) s. 1467 1012.585(3)(f) must successfully complete all competencies for a 1468 reading endorsement, including completion of the endorsement 1469 practicum. 1470 Section 27.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2), subsection 1471 (3), and paragraph (b) of subsection (5) of section 1012.585, 1472 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1473 1012.585âProcess for renewal of professional certificates.â 1474 (2)(a)âAll professional certificates, except a nonrenewable 1475 professional certificate, are shall be renewable for successive 1476 periods not to exceed 10 5 years after the date of submission of 1477 documentation of completion of the requirements for renewal 1478 provided in subsection (3). Only one renewal may be granted 1479 during each 5-year or 10-year validity period of a professional 1480 certificate. 1481 1.âAn applicant who is rated highly effective, pursuant to 1482 s. 1012.34, in the first 4 years of the 5-year validity period 1483 of his or her professional certificate is eligible for a 1484 professional certificate valid for 10 years. An applicant must 1485 be issued at least one 5-year professional certificate to be 1486 eligible for a 10-year professional certificate. An applicant 1487 who does not meet the requirement of this subparagraph is 1488 eligible only to renew his or her 5-year professional 1489 certificate. 1490 2.âAn applicant who is rated effective or highly effective, 1491 pursuant to s. 1012.34, for the first 9 years of the 10-year 1492 validity period of his or her professional certificate is 1493 eligible to renew a professional certificate valid for 10 years. 1494 An applicant issued a 10-year professional certificate who does 1495 not meet the requirement of this subparagraph is eligible only 1496 for renewal of a professional certificate valid for 5 years. 1497 (3)âFor the renewal of a professional certificate, the 1498 following requirements must be met: 1499 (a)âThe applicant must: 1500 1.âEarn a minimum of 6 college credits or 120 inservice 1501 points or a combination thereof for a certificate valid for 5 1502 years. 1503 2.âEarn a minimum of 12 college credits or 240 inservice 1504 points or a combination thereof for a professional certificate 1505 valid for 10 years. A minimum of 5 college credits or 100 1506 inservice points or a combination thereof must be earned within 1507 the first 5 years of a professional certificate valid for 10 1508 years. 1509 (b)âFor each area of specialization to be retained on a 1510 certificate, the applicant must earn at least 3 of the required 1511 credit hours or equivalent inservice points in the 1512 specialization area. Education in âclinical educatorâ training 1513 pursuant to s. 1004.04(5)(b); participation in mentorship and 1514 induction activities, including as a mentor, pursuant to s. 1515 1012.56(8)(a); credits or points that provide training in the 1516 knowledge and skills required to support students with autism; 1517 and credits or points that provide training in the area of 1518 scientifically researched, knowledge-based reading literacy 1519 grounded in the science of reading, including explicit, 1520 systematic, and sequential approaches to reading instruction, 1521 developing phonemic awareness, and implementing multisensory 1522 intervention strategies, and computational skills acquisition, 1523 exceptional student education, normal child development, and the 1524 disorders of development may be applied toward any 1525 specialization area. Credits or points that provide training in 1526 the areas of drug abuse, child abuse and neglect, strategies in 1527 teaching students having limited proficiency in English, or 1528 dropout prevention, or training in areas identified in the 1529 educational goals and performance standards adopted pursuant to 1530 ss. 1000.03(5) and 1008.345 may be applied toward any 1531 specialization area, except specialization areas identified by 1532 State Board of Education rule that include reading instruction 1533 or intervention for any students in kindergarten through grade 1534 6. Each district school board shall include in its inservice 1535 master plan the ability for teachers to receive inservice points 1536 for supporting students in extracurricular career and technical 1537 education activities, such as career and technical student 1538 organization activities outside of regular school hours and 1539 training related to supervising students participating in a 1540 career and technical student organization. Credits or points 1541 earned through approved summer institutes may be applied toward 1542 the fulfillment of these requirements. Inservice points may also 1543 be earned by participation in professional growth components 1544 approved by the State Board of Education and specified pursuant 1545 to s. 1012.98 in the districtâs approved master plan for 1546 inservice educational training; however, such points may not be 1547 used to satisfy the specialization requirements of this 1548 paragraph. 1549 (c)(b)âIn lieu of college course credit or inservice 1550 points, the applicant may renew a subject area specialization by 1551 passage of a state board approved Florida-developed subject area 1552 examination or, if a Florida subject area examination has not 1553 been developed, a standardized examination specified in state 1554 board rule. 1555 (d)(c)âIf an applicant wishes to retain more than two 1556 specialization areas on the certificate, the applicant must 1557 shall be permitted two successive validity periods for renewal 1558 of all specialization areas, but must earn no fewer than 6 1559 college course credit hours or the equivalent inservice points 1560 in any one validity period. 1561 (e)(d)âThe State Board of Education shall adopt rules for 1562 the expanded use of training for renewal of the professional 1563 certificate for educators who are required to complete training 1564 in teaching students of limited English proficiency or students 1565 with disabilities and training in the teaching of reading as 1566 follows: 1567 1.âA teacher who holds a professional certificate may use 1568 college credits or inservice points earned through training in 1569 teaching students of limited English proficiency or students 1570 with disabilities and training in the teaching of reading in 1571 excess of 6 semester hours during one certificate-validity 1572 period toward renewal of the professional certificate during the 1573 subsequent validity periods. 1574 2.âA teacher who holds a temporary certificate may use 1575 college credits or inservice points earned through training in 1576 teaching students of limited English proficiency or students 1577 with disabilities and training in the teaching of reading toward 1578 renewal of the teacherâs first professional certificate. Such 1579 training must not have been included within the degree program, 1580 and the teacherâs temporary and professional certificates must 1581 be issued for consecutive school years. 1582 (f)(e)âBeginning July 1, 2014, an applicant for renewal of 1583 a professional certificate must earn a minimum of one college 1584 credit or the equivalent inservice points in the area of 1585 instruction for teaching students with disabilities. The 1586 requirement in this paragraph may not add to the total hours 1587 required by the department for continuing education or inservice 1588 training. 1589 (g)(f)âAn applicant for renewal of a professional 1590 certificate in any area of certification identified by State 1591 Board of Education rule that includes reading instruction or 1592 intervention for any students in kindergarten through grade 6, 1593 with a beginning validity date of July 1, 2020, or thereafter, 1594 must earn a minimum of 2 college credits or the equivalent 1595 inservice points in evidence-based instruction and interventions 1596 grounded in the science of reading specifically designed for 1597 students with characteristics of dyslexia, including the use of 1598 explicit, systematic, and sequential approaches to reading 1599 instruction, developing phonological and phonemic awareness, 1600 decoding, and implementing multisensory intervention strategies. 1601 Such training must be provided by teacher preparation programs 1602 under s. 1004.04 or s. 1004.85 or approved school district 1603 professional learning systems under s. 1012.98. The requirements 1604 in this paragraph may not add to the total hours required by the 1605 department for continuing education or inservice training. 1606 (h)(g)âAn applicant for renewal of a professional 1607 certificate in educational leadership from a Level I program 1608 under s. 1012.562(2) or Level II program under s. 1012.562(3), 1609 with a beginning validity date of July 1, 2025, or thereafter, 1610 must earn a minimum of 1 college credit or 20 inservice points 1611 in Floridaâs educational leadership standards, as established in 1612 rule by the State Board of Education. The requirement in this 1613 paragraph may not add to the total hours required by the 1614 department for continuing education or inservice training. 1615 (i)(h)âA teacher may earn inservice points only once during 1616 each 5-year validity period for any mandatory training topic 1617 that is not linked to student learning or professional growth. 1618 (5)âThe State Board of Education shall adopt rules to allow 1619 the reinstatement of expired professional certificates. The 1620 department may reinstate an expired professional certificate if 1621 the certificateholder: 1622 (b)âDocuments completion of 6 college credits during the 5 1623 years immediately preceding reinstatement of the expired 1624 certificate, completion of 120 inservice points, or a 1625 combination thereof, in an area specified in paragraph (3)(b) 1626 (3)(a) to include the credit required under paragraph (3)(f) 1627 (3)(e). 1628 1629 The requirements of this subsection may not be satisfied by 1630 subject area examinations or college credits completed for 1631 issuance of the certificate that has expired. 1632 Section 28.âSection 1013.19, Florida Statutes, is amended 1633 to read: 1634 1013.19âPurchase, conveyance, or encumbrance of property 1635 interests above surface of land; joint-occupancy structures.âFor 1636 the purpose of implementing jointly financed construction 1637 project agreements, or for the construction of combined 1638 occupancy structures, any board may purchase, own, convey, sell, 1639 lease, or encumber airspace or any other interests in property 1640 above the surface of the land, provided the lease of airspace 1641 for nonpublic use is for such reasonable rent, length of term, 1642 and conditions as the board in its discretion may determine. All 1643 proceeds from such sale or lease shall be used by a the board of 1644 trustees for a Florida College System institution or state 1645 university or boards receiving the proceeds solely for fixed 1646 capital outlay purposes. These purposes may include the 1647 renovation or remodeling of existing facilities owned by the 1648 board or the construction of new facilities; however, for a 1649 Florida College System institution board or university board, 1650 such new facility must be authorized by the Legislature. It is 1651 declared that the use of such rental by the board for public 1652 purposes in accordance with its statutory authority is a public 1653 use. Airspace or any other interest in property held by the 1654 Board of Trustees of the Internal Improvement Trust Fund or the 1655 State Board of Education may not be divested or conveyed without 1656 approval of the respective board. Any building, including any 1657 building or facility component that is common to both nonpublic 1658 and educational portions thereof, constructed in airspace that 1659 is sold or leased for nonpublic use pursuant to this section is 1660 subject to all applicable state, county, and municipal 1661 regulations pertaining to land use, zoning, construction of 1662 buildings, fire protection, health, and safety to the same 1663 extent and in the same manner as such regulations would be 1664 applicable to the construction of a building for nonpublic use 1665 on the appurtenant land beneath the subject airspace. Any 1666 educational facility constructed or leased as a part of a joint 1667 occupancy facility is subject to all rules and requirements of 1668 the respective boards or departments having jurisdiction over 1669 educational facilities. Any contract executed by a university 1670 board of trustees pursuant to this section is subject to the 1671 provisions of s. 1010.62. 1672 Section 29.âSection 1013.35, Florida Statutes, is amended 1673 to read: 1674 1013.35âSchool district educational facilities plan; 1675 definitions; preparation, adoption, and amendment; long-term 1676 work programs.â 1677 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 1678 (a)ââAdopted educational facilities planâ means the 1679 comprehensive planning document that is adopted annually by the 1680 district school board as provided in subsection (2) and that 1681 contains the educational plant survey. 1682 (b)ââDistrict facilities work programâ means the 5-year 1683 listing of capital outlay projects adopted by the district 1684 school board as provided in subparagraph (2)(a)2. and paragraph 1685 (2)(b) as part of the district educational facilities plan, 1686 which is required in order to: 1687 1.âProperly maintain the educational plant and ancillary 1688 facilities of the district. 1689 2.âProvide an adequate number of satisfactory student 1690 stations for the projected student enrollment of the district in 1691 K-12 programs. 1692 (c)ââTentative educational facilities planâ means the 1693 comprehensive planning document prepared annually by the 1694 district school board and submitted to the Office of Educational 1695 Facilities and the affected general-purpose local governments. 1696 (2)âPREPARATION OF TENTATIVE DISTRICT EDUCATIONAL 1697 FACILITIES PLAN.â 1698 (a)âAnnually, before prior to the adoption of the district 1699 school budget, each district school board shall prepare a 1700 tentative district educational facilities plan that includes 1701 long-range planning for facilities needs over 5-year, 10-year, 1702 and 20-year periods. The district school board shall submit the 1703 tentative facilities plan to the department The plan must be 1704 developed in coordination with the general-purpose local 1705 governments and be consistent with the local government 1706 comprehensive plans. The school boardâs plan for provision of 1707 new schools must meet the needs of all growing communities in 1708 the district, ranging from small rural communities to large 1709 urban cities. The plan must include: 1710 1.âProjected student populations apportioned geographically 1711 at the local level. The projections must be based on information 1712 produced by the demographic, revenue, and education estimating 1713 conferences pursuant to s. 216.136, where available, as modified 1714 by the district based on development data and agreement with the 1715 local governments and the Office of Educational Facilities. The 1716 projections must be apportioned geographically with assistance 1717 from the local governments using local development trend data 1718 and the school district student enrollment data. 1719 2.âAn inventory of existing school facilities. Any 1720 anticipated expansions or closures of existing school sites over 1721 the 5-year, 10-year, and 20-year periods must be identified. The 1722 inventory must include an assessment of areas proximate to 1723 existing schools and identification of the need for improvements 1724 to infrastructure, safety, including safe access routes, and 1725 conditions in the community. The plan must also provide a 1726 listing of major repairs and renovation projects anticipated 1727 over the period of the plan. 1728 3.âProjections of facilities space needs, which may not 1729 exceed the norm space and occupant design criteria established 1730 in the State Requirements for Educational Facilities. 1731 4.âInformation on leased, loaned, and donated space and 1732 relocatables used for conducting the districtâs instructional 1733 programs. 1734 5.âThe general location of public schools proposed to be 1735 constructed over the 5-year, 10-year, and 20-year time periods, 1736 including a listing of the proposed schoolsâ site acreage needs 1737 and anticipated capacity and maps showing the general locations. 1738 The school boardâs identification of general locations of future 1739 school sites must be based on the school siting requirements of 1740 s. 163.3177(6)(a) and policies in the comprehensive plan which 1741 provide guidance for appropriate locations for school sites. 1742 6.âThe identification of options deemed reasonable and 1743 approved by the school board which reduce the need for 1744 additional permanent student stations. Such options may include, 1745 but need not be limited to: 1746 a.âAcceptable capacity; 1747 b.âRedistricting; 1748 c.âBusing; 1749 d.âYear-round schools; 1750 e.âCharter schools; 1751 f.âMagnet schools; and 1752 g.âPublic-private partnerships. 1753 7.âThe criteria and method, jointly determined by the local 1754 government and the school board, for determining the impact of 1755 proposed development to public school capacity. 1756 (b)âThe plan must also include a financially feasible 1757 district facilities work program for a 5-year period. The work 1758 program must include: 1759 1.âA schedule of major repair and renovation projects 1760 necessary to maintain the educational facilities and ancillary 1761 facilities of the district. 1762 2.âA schedule of capital outlay projects necessary to 1763 ensure the availability of satisfactory student stations for the 1764 projected student enrollment in K-12 programs. This schedule 1765 shall consider: 1766 a.âThe locations, capacities, and planned utilization rates 1767 of current educational facilities of the district. The capacity 1768 of existing satisfactory facilities, as reported in the Florida 1769 Inventory of School Houses must be compared to the capital 1770 outlay full-time-equivalent student enrollment as determined by 1771 the department, including all enrollment used in the calculation 1772 of the distribution formula in s. 1013.64. 1773 b.âThe proposed locations of planned facilities, whether 1774 those locations are consistent with the comprehensive plans of 1775 all affected local governments, and recommendations for 1776 infrastructure and other improvements to land adjacent to 1777 existing facilities. The provisions of ss. 1013.33(6), (7), and 1778 (8) and 1013.36 must be addressed for new facilities planned 1779 within the first 3 years of the work plan, as appropriate. 1780 c.âPlans for the use and location of relocatable 1781 facilities, leased facilities, and charter school facilities. 1782 d.âPlans for multitrack scheduling, grade level 1783 organization, block scheduling, or other alternatives that 1784 reduce the need for additional permanent student stations. 1785 e.âInformation concerning average class size and 1786 utilization rate by grade level within the district which will 1787 result if the tentative district facilities work program is 1788 fully implemented. 1789 f.âThe number and percentage of district students planned 1790 to be educated in relocatable facilities during each year of the 1791 tentative district facilities work program. For determining 1792 future needs, student capacity may not be assigned to any 1793 relocatable classroom that is scheduled for elimination or 1794 replacement with a permanent educational facility in the current 1795 year of the adopted district educational facilities plan and in 1796 the district facilities work program adopted under this section. 1797 Those relocatable classrooms clearly identified and scheduled 1798 for replacement in a school-board-adopted, financially feasible, 1799 5-year district facilities work program shall be counted at zero 1800 capacity at the time the work program is adopted and approved by 1801 the school board. However, if the district facilities work 1802 program is changed and the relocatable classrooms are not 1803 replaced as scheduled in the work program, the classrooms must 1804 be reentered into the system and be counted at actual capacity. 1805 Relocatable classrooms may not be perpetually added to the work 1806 program or continually extended for purposes of circumventing 1807 this section. All relocatable classrooms not identified and 1808 scheduled for replacement, including those owned, lease 1809 purchased, or leased by the school district, must be counted at 1810 actual student capacity. The district educational facilities 1811 plan must identify the number of relocatable student stations 1812 scheduled for replacement during the 5-year survey period and 1813 the total dollar amount needed for that replacement. 1814 g.âPlans for the closure of any school, including plans for 1815 disposition of the facility or usage of facility space, and 1816 anticipated revenues. 1817 h.âProjects for which capital outlay and debt service funds 1818 accruing under s. 9(d), Art. XII of the State Constitution are 1819 to be used shall be identified separately in priority order on a 1820 project priority list within the district facilities work 1821 program. 1822 3.âThe projected cost for each project identified in the 1823 district facilities work program. For proposed projects for new 1824 student stations, a schedule shall be prepared comparing the 1825 planned cost and square footage for each new student station, by 1826 elementary, middle, and high school levels, to the low, average, 1827 and high cost of facilities constructed throughout the state 1828 during the most recent fiscal year for which data is available 1829 from the Department of Education. 1830 4.âA schedule of estimated capital outlay revenues from 1831 each currently approved source which is estimated to be 1832 available for expenditure on the projects included in the 1833 district facilities work program. 1834 5.âA schedule indicating which projects included in the 1835 district facilities work program will be funded from current 1836 revenues projected in subparagraph 4. 1837 6.âA schedule of options for the generation of additional 1838 revenues by the district for expenditure on projects identified 1839 in the district facilities work program which are not funded 1840 under subparagraph 5. Additional anticipated revenues may 1841 include Classrooms First funds. 1842 (c)âTo the extent available, the tentative district 1843 educational facilities plan shall be based on information 1844 produced by the demographic, revenue, and education estimating 1845 conferences pursuant to s. 216.136. 1846 (2)(d)âProvision must shall be made for public comment 1847 concerning the tentative district educational facilities plan. 1848 (e)âThe district school board shall coordinate with each 1849 affected local government to ensure consistency between the 1850 tentative district educational facilities plan and the local 1851 government comprehensive plans of the affected local governments 1852 during the development of the tentative district educational 1853 facilities plan. 1854 (3)(f)âNot less than once every 5 years, the district 1855 school board shall have an audit conducted of the districtâs 1856 educational planning and construction activities. An operational 1857 audit conducted by the Auditor General pursuant to s. 11.45 1858 satisfies this requirement. 1859 (4)(3)âSUBMITTAL OF TENTATIVE DISTRICT EDUCATIONAL 1860 FACILITIES PLAN TO LOCAL GOVERNMENT.âThe district school board 1861 shall submit a copy of its tentative district educational 1862 facilities plan to all affected local governments before prior 1863 to adoption by the board. The affected local governments may 1864 shall review the tentative district educational facilities plan 1865 and comment to the district school board on the consistency of 1866 the plan with the local comprehensive plan, whether a 1867 comprehensive plan amendment will be necessary for any proposed 1868 educational facility, and whether the local government supports 1869 a necessary comprehensive plan amendment. If the local 1870 government does not support a comprehensive plan amendment for a 1871 proposed educational facility, the matter must shall be resolved 1872 pursuant to the interlocal agreement when required by ss. 1873 163.3177(6)(h), 163.31777, and 1013.33(2). The process for the 1874 submittal and review must shall be detailed in the interlocal 1875 agreement when required pursuant to ss. 163.3177(6)(h), 1876 163.31777, and 1013.33(2). 1877 (5)(4)âADOPTED DISTRICT EDUCATIONAL FACILITIES PLAN. 1878 Annually, the district school board shall consider and adopt the 1879 tentative district educational facilities plan completed 1880 pursuant to subsection (2). Upon giving proper notice to the 1881 public and local governments and opportunity for public comment, 1882 the district school board may amend the plan to revise the 1883 priority of projects, to add or delete projects, to reflect the 1884 impact of change orders, or to reflect the approval of new 1885 revenue sources which may become available. The district school 1886 board shall submit the revised plan to the department. The 1887 adopted district educational facilities plan must shall: 1888 (a)âBe a complete, balanced, and financially feasible 1889 capital outlay financial plan for the district. 1890 (b)âSet forth the proposed commitments and planned 1891 expenditures of the district to address the educational 1892 facilities needs of its students and to adequately provide for 1893 the maintenance of the educational plant and ancillary 1894 facilities, including safe access ways from neighborhoods to 1895 schools. 1896 (6)(5)âEXECUTION OF ADOPTED DISTRICT EDUCATIONAL FACILITIES 1897 PLAN.âThe first year of the adopted district educational 1898 facilities plan constitutes shall constitute the capital outlay 1899 budget required in s. 1013.61. The adopted district educational 1900 facilities plan shall include the information required in 1901 subparagraphs (2)(b)1., 2., and 3., based upon projects actually 1902 funded in the plan. 1903 Section 30.âSubsections (3) and (4) of section 1013.41, 1904 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1905 1013.41âSMART schools; Classrooms First; legislative 1906 purpose.â 1907 (3)âSCHOOL DISTRICT EDUCATIONAL FACILITIES PLAN.âIt is the 1908 purpose of the Legislature to create s. 1013.35, requiring each 1909 school district annually to adopt an educational facilities plan 1910 that provides an integrated long-range facilities plan, 1911 including the survey of projected needs and the 5-year work 1912 program. The purpose of the educational facilities plan is to 1913 keep the district school board, local governments, and the 1914 public fully informed as to whether the district is using sound 1915 policies and practices that meet the essential needs of students 1916 and that warrant public confidence in district operations. The 1917 educational facilities plan will be monitored by the Office of 1918 Educational Facilities, which will also apply performance 1919 standards pursuant to s. 1013.04. 1920 (4)âOFFICE OF EDUCATIONAL FACILITIES.âIt is the purpose of 1921 the Legislature to require the Office of Educational Facilities 1922 to assist school districts in building SMART schools utilizing 1923 functional and frugal practices. The Office of Educational 1924 Facilities shall must review district facilities work programs 1925 and projects and identify opportunities to maximize design and 1926 construction savings; develop school district facilities work 1927 program performance standards; and provide for review and 1928 recommendations to the Governor, the Legislature, and the State 1929 Board of Education. 1930 Section 31.âSubsection (4) of section 1013.45, Florida 1931 Statutes, is amended to read: 1932 1013.45âEducational facilities contracting and construction 1933 techniques for school districts and Florida College System 1934 institutions.â 1935 (4)âExcept as otherwise provided in this section and s. 1936 481.229, the services of a registered architect must be used by 1937 Florida College System institution and state university boards 1938 of trustees for the development of plans for the erection, 1939 enlargement, or alteration of any educational facility. The 1940 services of a registered architect are not required for a minor 1941 renovation project for which the construction cost is less than 1942 $50,000 or for the placement or hookup of relocatable 1943 educational facilities that conform to standards adopted under 1944 s. 1013.37. However, boards must provide compliance with 1945 building code requirements and ensure that these structures are 1946 adequately anchored for wind resistance as required by law. A 1947 district school board shall reuse existing construction 1948 documents or design criteria packages if such reuse is feasible 1949 and practical. If a school districtâs 5-year educational 1950 facilities work plan includes the construction of two or more 1951 new schools for students in the same grade group and program, 1952 such as elementary, middle, or high school, the district school 1953 board must require that prototype design and construction be 1954 used for the construction of these schools. Notwithstanding s. 1955 287.055, a board may purchase the architectural services for the 1956 design of educational or ancillary facilities under an existing 1957 contract agreement for professional services held by a district 1958 school board in the State of Florida, provided that the purchase 1959 is to the economic advantage of the purchasing board, the 1960 services conform to the standards prescribed by rules of the 1961 State Board of Education, and such reuse is not without notice 1962 to, and permission from, the architect of record whose plans or 1963 design criteria are being reused. Plans must be reviewed for 1964 compliance with the State Requirements for Educational 1965 Facilities. Rules adopted under this section must establish 1966 uniform prequalification, selection, bidding, and negotiation 1967 procedures applicable to construction management contracts and 1968 the design-build process. This section does not supersede any 1969 small, woman-owned, or minority-owned business enterprise 1970 preference program adopted by a board. Except as otherwise 1971 provided in this section, the negotiation procedures applicable 1972 to construction management contracts and the design-build 1973 process must conform to the requirements of s. 287.055. A board 1974 may not modify any rules regarding construction management 1975 contracts or the design-build process. 1976 Section 32.âSection 1013.451, Florida Statutes, is 1977 repealed. 1978 Section 33.âParagraph (e) of subsection (1) and paragraph 1979 (b) of subsection (6) of section 1013.64, Florida Statutes, are 1980 amended to read: 1981 1013.64âFunds for comprehensive educational plant needs; 1982 construction cost maximums for school district capital 1983 projects.âAllocations from the Public Education Capital Outlay 1984 and Debt Service Trust Fund to the various boards for capital 1985 outlay projects shall be determined as follows: 1986 (1) 1987 (e)âRemodeling projects must shall be based on the 1988 recommendations of a survey pursuant to s. 1013.31, or, for 1989 district school boards, as indicated by the relative need as 1990 determined by the Florida Inventory of School Houses and the 1991 capital outlay full-time equivalent enrollment in the district. 1992 (6) 1993 (b)1.âA district school board may not use funds from the 1994 following sources: Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt 1995 Service Trust Fund; School District and Community College 1996 District Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund; Classrooms 1997 First Program funds provided in s. 1013.68; nonvoted 1.5-mill 1998 levy of ad valorem property taxes provided in s. 1011.71(2); 1999 Classrooms for Kids Program funds provided in s. 1013.735; 2000 District Effort Recognition Program funds provided in s. 2001 1013.736; or High Growth District Capital Outlay Assistance 2002 Grant Program funds provided in s. 1013.738 to pay for any 2003 portion of the cost of any new construction of educational plant 2004 space with a total cost per student station, including change 2005 orders, which exceeds: 2006 a.â$17,952 for an elementary school; 2007 b.â$19,386 for a middle school; or 2008 c.â$25,181 for a high school, 2009 2010 (January 2006) as adjusted annually to reflect increases or 2011 decreases in the Consumer Price Index. The department, in 2012 conjunction with the Office of Economic and Demographic 2013 Research, shall review and adjust the cost per student station 2014 limits to reflect actual construction costs by January 1, 2020, 2015 and annually thereafter. The adjusted cost per student station 2016 shall be used by the department for computation of the statewide 2017 average costs per student station for each instructional level 2018 pursuant to paragraph (d). The department shall also collaborate 2019 with the Office of Economic and Demographic Research to select 2020 an industry-recognized construction index to replace the 2021 Consumer Price Index by January 1, 2020, adjusted annually to 2022 reflect changes in the construction index. 2023 2.âSchool districts shall maintain accurate documentation 2024 related to the costs of all new construction of educational 2025 plant space reported to the Department of Education pursuant to 2026 paragraph (d). The Auditor General shall review the 2027 documentation maintained by the school districts and verify 2028 compliance with the limits under this paragraph during its 2029 scheduled operational audits of the school district. 2030 3.âExcept for educational facilities and sites subject to a 2031 lease-purchase agreement entered pursuant to s. 1011.71(2)(e) or 2032 funded solely through local impact fees, in addition to the 2033 funding sources listed in subparagraph 1., a district school 2034 board may not use funds from any sources for new construction of 2035 educational plant space with a total cost per student station, 2036 including change orders, which equals more than the current 2037 adjusted amounts provided in sub-subparagraphs 1.a.-c. However, 2038 if a contract has been executed for architectural and design 2039 services or for construction management services before July 1, 2040 2017, a district school board may use funds from any source for 2041 the new construction of educational plant space and such funds 2042 are exempt from the total cost per student station requirements. 2043 4.âA district school board must not use funds from the 2044 Public Education Capital Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund or 2045 the School District and Community College District Capital 2046 Outlay and Debt Service Trust Fund for any new construction of 2047 an ancillary plant that exceeds 70 percent of the average cost 2048 per square foot of new construction for all schools. 2049 Section 34.âParagraph (e) of subsection (6) of section 2050 163.3180, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2051 163.3180âConcurrency.â 2052 (6) 2053 (e)âA school district that includes relocatable facilities 2054 in its inventory of student stations shall include the capacity 2055 of such relocatable facilities as provided in s. 2056 1013.35(2)(b)2.f., provided the relocatable facilities were 2057 purchased after 1998 and the relocatable facilities meet the 2058 standards for long-term use pursuant to s. 1013.20. 2059 Section 35.âParagraph (a) of subsection (10) of section 2060 200.065, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2061 200.065âMethod of fixing millage.â 2062 (10)(a)âIn addition to the notice required in subsection 2063 (3), a district school board shall publish a second notice of 2064 intent to levy additional taxes under s. 1011.71(2) or (3). The 2065 notice shall specify the projects or number of school buses 2066 anticipated to be funded by the additional taxes and shall be 2067 published in the size, within the time periods, adjacent to, and 2068 in substantial conformity with the advertisement required under 2069 subsection (3). The projects shall be listed in priority within 2070 each category as follows: construction and remodeling; 2071 maintenance, renovation, and repair; motor vehicle purchases; 2072 new and replacement equipment; payments for educational 2073 facilities and sites due under a lease-purchase agreement; 2074 payments for renting and leasing educational facilities and 2075 sites; payments of loans approved pursuant to ss. 1011.14 and 2076 1011.15; payment of costs of compliance with environmental 2077 statutes and regulations; payment of premiums for property and 2078 casualty insurance necessary to insure the educational and 2079 ancillary plants of the school district; payment of costs of 2080 leasing relocatable educational facilities; and payments to 2081 private entities to offset the cost of school buses pursuant to 2082 s. 1011.71(2)(i). The additional notice shall be in the 2083 following form, except that if the district school board is 2084 proposing to levy the same millage under s. 1011.71(2) or (3) 2085 which it levied in the prior year, the words âcontinue toâ shall 2086 be inserted before the word âimposeâ in the first sentence, and 2087 except that the second sentence of the second paragraph shall be 2088 deleted if the district is advertising pursuant to paragraph 2089 (3)(e): 2090 2091 NOTICE OF TAX FOR SCHOOL 2092 CAPITAL OUTLAY 2093 2094 The ...(name of school district)... will soon consider a 2095 measure to impose a ...(number)... mill property tax for the 2096 capital outlay projects listed herein. 2097 This tax is in addition to the school boardâs proposed tax 2098 of ...(number)... mills for operating expenses and is proposed 2099 solely at the discretion of the school board. THE PROPOSED 2100 COMBINED SCHOOL BOARD TAX INCREASE FOR BOTH OPERATING EXPENSES 2101 AND CAPITAL OUTLAY IS SHOWN IN THE ADJACENT NOTICE. 2102 The capital outlay tax will generate approximately 2103 $...(amount)..., to be used for the following projects: 2104 2105 ...(list of capital outlay projects)... 2106 2107 All concerned citizens are invited to a public hearing to 2108 be held on ...(date and time)... at ...(meeting place).... 2109 A DECISION on the proposed CAPITAL OUTLAY TAXES will be 2110 made at this hearing. 2111 2112 Section 36.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 2113 1002.68, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2114 1002.68âVoluntary Prekindergarten Education Program 2115 accountability.â 2116 (5)(a)âIf a public schoolâs or private prekindergarten 2117 providerâs program assessment composite score for its 2118 prekindergarten classrooms fails to meet the minimum program 2119 assessment composite score for contracting adopted in rule by 2120 the department, the private prekindergarten provider or public 2121 school may not participate in the Voluntary Prekindergarten 2122 Education Program beginning in the consecutive program year and 2123 thereafter until the public school or private prekindergarten 2124 provider meets the minimum composite score for contracting. A 2125 public school or private prekindergarten provider may request 2126 one program assessment per program year in order to requalify 2127 for participation in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education 2128 Program, provided that the public school or private 2129 prekindergarten provider is not excluded from participation 2130 under s. 1002.55(6), s. 1002.61(10)(b), s. 1002.63(9) ss. 2131 1002.55(6), 1002.61(10)(b), 1002.63(9)(b), or paragraph (5)(b) 2132 of this section. If a public school or private prekindergarten 2133 provider would like an additional program assessment completed 2134 within the same program year, the public school or private 2135 prekindergarten provider is shall be responsible for the cost of 2136 the program assessment. 2137 Section 37.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 2138 1003.631, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2139 1003.631âSchools of Excellence.âThe Schools of Excellence 2140 Program is established to provide administrative flexibility to 2141 the stateâs top schools so that the instructional personnel and 2142 administrative staff at such schools can continue to serve their 2143 communities and increase student learning to the best of their 2144 professional ability. 2145 (2)âADMINISTRATIVE FLEXIBILITIES.âA School of Excellence 2146 must be provided the following administrative flexibilities: 2147 (c)âFor instructional personnel, the substitution of 1 2148 school year of employment at a School of Excellence for 20 2149 inservice points toward the renewal of a professional 2150 certificate, up to 60 inservice points in a 5-year cycle, 2151 pursuant to s. 1012.585(3). 2152 Section 38.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) and paragraph 2153 (b) of subsection (5) of section 1004.04, Florida Statutes, are 2154 amended to read: 2155 1004.04âPublic accountability and state approval for 2156 teacher preparation programs.â 2157 (2)âUNIFORM CORE CURRICULA AND CANDIDATE ASSESSMENT.â 2158 (c)âEach candidate must receive instruction and be assessed 2159 on the uniform core curricula in the candidateâs area or areas 2160 of program concentration during course work and field 2161 experiences. Beginning with candidates entering a teacher 2162 preparation program in the 2022-2023 school year, a candidate 2163 for certification in a coverage area identified pursuant to s. 2164 1012.585(3)(g) s. 1012.585(3)(f) must successfully complete all 2165 competencies for a reading endorsement, including completion of 2166 the endorsement practicum through the candidateâs field 2167 experience under subsection (5), in order to graduate from the 2168 program. 2169 (5)âPRESERVICE FIELD EXPERIENCE.âAll postsecondary 2170 instructors, school district personnel and instructional 2171 personnel, and school sites preparing instructional personnel 2172 through preservice field experience courses and internships 2173 shall meet special requirements. District school boards may pay 2174 student teachers during their internships. 2175 (b)1.âAll school district personnel and instructional 2176 personnel who supervise or direct teacher preparation students 2177 during field experience courses or internships taking place in 2178 this state in which candidates demonstrate an impact on student 2179 learning growth must have: 2180 a.âEvidence of âclinical educatorâ training; 2181 b.âA valid professional certificate issued pursuant to s. 2182 1012.56; 2183 c.âAt least 3 years of teaching experience in 2184 prekindergarten through grade 12; 2185 d.âEarned an effective or highly effective rating on the 2186 prior yearâs performance evaluation under s. 1012.34 or be a 2187 peer evaluator under the districtâs evaluation system approved 2188 under s. 1012.34; and 2189 e.âBeginning with the 2022-2023 school year, for all such 2190 personnel who supervise or direct teacher preparation students 2191 during internships in kindergarten through grade 3 or who are 2192 enrolled in a teacher preparation program for a certificate area 2193 identified pursuant to s. 1012.585(3)(g) s. 1012.585(3)(f), a 2194 certificate or endorsement in reading. 2195 2196 The State Board of Education shall approve the training 2197 requirements. 2198 2.âAll instructional personnel who supervise or direct 2199 teacher preparation students during field experience courses or 2200 internships in another state, in which a candidate demonstrates 2201 his or her impact on student learning growth, through a Florida 2202 online or distance program must have received âclinical 2203 educatorâ training or its equivalent in that state, hold a valid 2204 professional certificate issued by the state in which the field 2205 experience takes place, and have at least 3 years of teaching 2206 experience in prekindergarten through grade 12. 2207 3.âAll instructional personnel who supervise or direct 2208 teacher preparation students during field experience courses or 2209 internships, in which a candidate demonstrates his or her impact 2210 on student learning growth, on a United States military base in 2211 another country through a Florida online or distance program 2212 must have received âclinical educatorâ training or its 2213 equivalent, hold a valid professional certificate issued by the 2214 United States Department of Defense or a state or territory of 2215 the United States, and have at least 3 years teaching experience 2216 in prekindergarten through grade 12. 2217 Section 39.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 2218 1004.85, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2219 1004.85âPostsecondary educator preparation institutes.â 2220 (3)âEducator preparation institutes approved pursuant to 2221 this section may offer competency-based certification programs 2222 specifically designed for noneducation major baccalaureate 2223 degree holders to enable program participants to meet the 2224 educator certification requirements of s. 1012.56. An educator 2225 preparation institute choosing to offer a competency-based 2226 certification program pursuant to the provisions of this section 2227 must implement a program developed by the institute and approved 2228 by the department for this purpose. Approved programs shall be 2229 available for use by other approved educator preparation 2230 institutes. 2231 (b)âEach program participant must: 2232 1.âMeet certification requirements pursuant to s. 2233 1012.56(1) by obtaining a statement of status of eligibility in 2234 the certification subject area of the educational plan and meet 2235 the requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f) before participating in 2236 field experiences. 2237 2.âDemonstrate competency and participate in field 2238 experiences that are appropriate to his or her educational plan 2239 prepared under paragraph (a). Beginning with candidates entering 2240 an educator preparation institute in the 2022-2023 school year, 2241 a candidate for certification in a coverage area identified 2242 pursuant to s. 1012.585(3)(g) s. 1012.585(3)(f) must 2243 successfully complete all competencies for a reading 2244 endorsement, including completion of the endorsement practicum 2245 through the candidateâs field experience, in order to graduate 2246 from the program. 2247 3.âBefore completion of the program, fully demonstrate his 2248 or her ability to teach the subject area for which he or she is 2249 seeking certification by documenting a positive impact on 2250 student learning growth in a prekindergarten through grade 12 2251 setting and, except as provided in s. 1012.56(7)(a)3., achieving 2252 a passing score on the professional education competency 2253 examination, the basic skills examination, and the subject area 2254 examination for the subject area certification which is required 2255 by state board rule. 2256 Section 40.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 2257 1012.552, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2258 1012.552âThe Coaching for Educator Readiness and Teaching 2259 (CERT) Certification Program.â 2260 (2)âPROGRAM REQUIREMENTS.âA CERT program must include all 2261 of the following: 2262 (e)âRequired successful completion of all competencies for 2263 a reading endorsement, including completion of the endorsement 2264 practicum, for a candidate certification in a coverage area 2265 identified pursuant to s. 1012.585(3)(g) s. 1012.585(3)(f). 2266 Section 41.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 2267 1012.586, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2268 1012.586âAdditions or changes to certificates; duplicate 2269 certificates; reading endorsement pathways.â 2270 (2) 2271 (b)âAs part of adopting a pathway pursuant to paragraph 2272 (a), the department shall review the competencies for the 2273 reading endorsement and subject area examinations for educator 2274 certificates identified pursuant to s. 1012.585(3)(g) s. 2275 1012.585(3)(f) for alignment with evidence-based instructional 2276 and intervention strategies rooted in the science of reading and 2277 identified pursuant to s. 1001.215(7) and recommend changes to 2278 the State Board of Education. Recommended changes must address 2279 identification of the characteristics of conditions such as 2280 dyslexia, implementation of evidence-based classroom instruction 2281 and interventions, including evidence-based reading instruction 2282 and interventions specifically for students with characteristics 2283 of dyslexia, and effective progress monitoring. By July 1, 2023, 2284 each school district reading endorsement add-on program must be 2285 resubmitted for approval by the department consistent with this 2286 paragraph. 2287 Section 42.âParagraph (b) of subsection (5) of section 2288 1012.98, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2289 1012.98âSchool Community Professional Learning Act.â 2290 (5)âThe Department of Education, school districts, schools, 2291 Florida College System institutions, and state universities 2292 share the responsibilities described in this section. These 2293 responsibilities include the following: 2294 (b)âEach school district shall develop a professional 2295 learning system as specified in subsection (4). The system shall 2296 be developed in consultation with teachers, teacher-educators of 2297 Florida College System institutions and state universities, 2298 business and community representatives, and local education 2299 foundations, consortia, and professional organizations. The 2300 professional learning system must: 2301 1.âBe reviewed and approved by the department for 2302 compliance with s. 1003.42(3) and this section. Effective March 2303 1, 2024, the department shall establish a calendar for the 2304 review and approval of all professional learning systems. A 2305 professional learning system must be reviewed and approved every 2306 5 years. Any substantial revisions to the system must be 2307 submitted to the department for review and approval. The 2308 department shall establish a format for the review and approval 2309 of a professional learning system. 2310 2.âBe based on analyses of student achievement data and 2311 instructional strategies and methods that support rigorous, 2312 relevant, and challenging curricula for all students. Schools 2313 and districts, in developing and refining the professional 2314 learning system, shall also review and monitor school discipline 2315 data; school environment surveys; assessments of parental 2316 satisfaction; performance appraisal data of teachers, managers, 2317 and administrative personnel; and other performance indicators 2318 to identify school and student needs that can be met by improved 2319 professional performance. 2320 3.âProvide inservice activities coupled with follow-up 2321 followup support appropriate to accomplish district-level and 2322 school-level improvement goals and standards. The inservice 2323 activities for instructional and school administrative personnel 2324 shall focus on analysis of student achievement data; ongoing 2325 formal and informal assessments of student achievement; 2326 identification and use of enhanced and differentiated 2327 instructional strategies that emphasize rigor, relevance, and 2328 reading in the content areas; enhancement of subject content 2329 expertise; integrated use of classroom technology that enhances 2330 teaching and learning; classroom management; parent involvement; 2331 and school safety. 2332 4.âProvide inservice activities and support targeted to the 2333 individual needs of new teachers participating in the 2334 professional learning certification and education competency 2335 program under s. 1012.56(8)(a). 2336 5.âInclude a professional learning catalog for inservice 2337 activities, pursuant to rules of the State Board of Education, 2338 for all district employees from all fund sources. The catalog 2339 must be updated annually by September 1, must be based on input 2340 from teachers and district and school instructional leaders, and 2341 must use the latest available student achievement data and 2342 research to enhance rigor and relevance in the classroom. Each 2343 district inservice catalog must be aligned to and support the 2344 school-based inservice catalog and school improvement plans 2345 pursuant to s. 1001.42(18). Each district inservice catalog must 2346 provide a description of the training that middle grades 2347 instructional personnel and school administrators receive on the 2348 districtâs code of student conduct adopted pursuant to s. 2349 1006.07; integrated digital instruction and competency-based 2350 instruction and CAPE Digital Tool certificates and CAPE industry 2351 certifications; classroom management; student behavior and 2352 interaction; extended learning opportunities for students; and 2353 instructional leadership. District plans must be approved by the 2354 district school board annually in order to ensure compliance 2355 with subsection (1) and to allow for dissemination of research 2356 based best practices to other districts. District school boards 2357 shall submit verification of their approval to the Commissioner 2358 of Education no later than October 1, annually. Each school 2359 principal may establish and maintain an individual professional 2360 learning plan for each instructional employee assigned to the 2361 school as a seamless component to the school improvement plans 2362 developed pursuant to s. 1001.42(18). An individual professional 2363 learning plan must be related to specific performance data for 2364 the students to whom the teacher is assigned, define the 2365 inservice objectives and specific measurable improvements 2366 expected in student performance as a result of the inservice 2367 activity, and include an evaluation component that determines 2368 the effectiveness of the professional learning plan. 2369 6.âInclude inservice activities for school administrative 2370 personnel, aligned to the stateâs educational leadership 2371 standards, which address updated skills necessary for 2372 instructional leadership and effective school management 2373 pursuant to s. 1012.986. 2374 7.âProvide for systematic consultation with regional and 2375 state personnel designated to provide technical assistance and 2376 evaluation of local professional learning programs. 2377 8.âProvide for delivery of professional learning by 2378 distance learning and other technology-based delivery systems to 2379 reach more educators at lower costs. 2380 9.âProvide for the continuous evaluation of the quality and 2381 effectiveness of professional learning programs in order to 2382 eliminate ineffective programs and strategies and to expand 2383 effective ones. Evaluations must consider the impact of such 2384 activities on the performance of participating educators and 2385 their studentsâ achievement and behavior. 2386 10.âFor all grades, emphasize: 2387 a.âInterdisciplinary planning, collaboration, and 2388 instruction. 2389 b.âAlignment of curriculum and instructional materials to 2390 the state academic standards adopted pursuant to s. 1003.41. 2391 c.âUse of small learning communities; problem-solving, 2392 inquiry-driven research and analytical approaches for students; 2393 strategies and tools based on student needs; competency-based 2394 instruction; integrated digital instruction; and project-based 2395 instruction. 2396 2397 Each school that includes any of grades 6, 7, or 8 shall include 2398 in its school improvement plan, required under s. 1001.42(18), a 2399 description of the specific strategies used by the school to 2400 implement each item listed in this subparagraph. 2401 11.âProvide training to reading coaches, classroom 2402 teachers, and school administrators in effective methods of 2403 identifying characteristics of conditions such as dyslexia and 2404 other causes of diminished phonological processing skills; 2405 incorporating instructional techniques into the general 2406 education setting which are proven to improve reading 2407 performance for all students; and using predictive and other 2408 data to make instructional decisions based on individual student 2409 needs. The training must help teachers integrate phonemic 2410 awareness; phonics, word study, and spelling; reading fluency; 2411 vocabulary, including academic vocabulary; and text 2412 comprehension strategies into an explicit, systematic, and 2413 sequential approach to reading instruction, including 2414 multisensory intervention strategies. Such training for teaching 2415 foundational skills must be based on the science of reading and 2416 include phonics instruction for decoding and encoding as the 2417 primary instructional strategy for word reading. Instructional 2418 strategies included in the training may not employ the three 2419 cueing system model of reading or visual memory as a basis for 2420 teaching word reading. Such instructional strategies may include 2421 visual information and strategies which improve background and 2422 experiential knowledge, add context, and increase oral language 2423 and vocabulary to support comprehension, but may not be used to 2424 teach word reading. Each district shall must provide all 2425 elementary grades instructional personnel access to training 2426 sufficient to meet the requirements of s. 1012.585(3)(g) s. 2427 1012.585(3)(f). 2428 Section 43.âSubsection (3) of section 1013.62, Florida 2429 Statutes, is amended to read: 2430 1013.62âCharter schools capital outlay funding.â 2431 (3)âIf the school board levies the discretionary millage 2432 authorized in s. 1011.71(2), the department must shall use the 2433 following calculation methodology to determine the amount of 2434 revenue that a school district must distribute to each eligible 2435 charter school: 2436 (a)âReduce the total discretionary millage revenue by the 2437 school districtâs annual debt service obligation incurred as of 2438 March 1, 2017, which has not been subsequently retired, and any 2439 amount of participation requirement pursuant to s. 2440 1013.64(2)(a)8. that is being satisfied by revenues raised by 2441 the discretionary millage. 2442 (b)âDivide the school districtâs adjusted discretionary 2443 millage revenue by the districtâs total capital outlay full-time 2444 equivalent membership and the total number of full-time 2445 equivalent students of each eligible charter school to determine 2446 a capital outlay allocation per full-time equivalent student. 2447 (c)âMultiply the capital outlay allocation per full-time 2448 equivalent student by the total number of full-time equivalent 2449 students of each eligible charter school to determine the 2450 capital outlay allocation for each charter school. 2451 (d)âIf applicable, reduce the capital outlay allocation 2452 identified in paragraph (c) by the total amount of state funds 2453 allocated to each eligible charter school in subsection (2) to 2454 determine the maximum calculated capital outlay allocation. The 2455 amount of funds a school district must distribute to charter 2456 schools shall be as follows: 2457 1.âFor fiscal year 2023-2024, the amount is 20 percent of 2458 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 2459 2.âFor fiscal year 2024-2025, the amount is 40 percent of 2460 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 2461 3.âFor fiscal year 2025-2026, the amount is 60 percent of 2462 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 2463 4.âFor fiscal year 2026-2027, the amount is 80 percent of 2464 the amount calculated under this paragraph. 2465 5.âFor fiscal year 2027-2028, and each fiscal year 2466 thereafter, the amount is 100 percent of the amount calculated 2467 under this paragraph. 2468 (e)âSchool districts shall distribute capital outlay funds 2469 to eligible charter schools no later than February 1 of each 2470 year, as required by this subsection, based on the amount of 2471 funds received by the district school board. School districts 2472 shall distribute any remaining capital outlay funds, as required 2473 by this subsection, upon the receipt of such funds until the 2474 total amount calculated pursuant to this subsection is 2475 distributed. 2476 2477 By October 1 of each year, each school district shall certify to 2478 the department the amount of debt service and participation 2479 requirement that complies with the requirement of paragraph (a) 2480 and can be reduced from the total discretionary millage revenue. 2481 The Auditor General shall verify compliance with the 2482 requirements of paragraph (a) and s. 1011.71(2)(e) during 2483 scheduled operational audits of school districts. 2484 Section 44.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.